

Jim D Black | Free Public Records | PublicRecords360
















Login | Register








Search Options




First Name *



Middle Name



Last Name *



City



State

All States 
Alabama 
Alaska 
Arizona 
Arkansas 
California 
Colorado 
Connecticut 
Delaware 
Florida 
Georgia 
Hawaii 
Idaho 
Illinois 
Indiana 
Iowa 
Kansas 
Kentucky 
Louisiana 
Maine 
Maryland 
Massachusetts 
Michigan 
Minnesota 
Mississippi 
Missouri 
Montana 
Nebraska 
Nevada 
New Hampshire 
New Jersey 
New Mexico 
New York 
North Carolina 
North Dakota 
Ohio 
Oklahoma 
Oregon 
Pennsylvania 
Puerto Rico 
Rhode Island 
South Carolina 
South Dakota 
Tennessee 
Texas 
Utah 
Vermont 
Virginia 
Washington 
Washington D.C. 
West Virginia 
Wisconsin 
Wyoming 








 


Safe Search


Your search is confidential. Jim D Black will not be notified of your purchase.

 
Related SearchesDonald James BlackJimmy Don BlackJimmy Dean BlackJim E BlackJames Donald Black

Connect With Us











33 Matching Results!Showing Top 20. Use filters to see more.
Filter By Age:All AgesNo Age30 - 3940 - 4950 - 5960 - 6970 - 7980 - 89Has lived in:All CitiesAL - EclecticAL - MillbrookAR - Fort SmithAR - HackettAR - HopeAZ - LakesideCA - AtwaterCA - CeresCA - Daly CityCA - MillbraeCA - ModestoCA - OakdaleCA - ReddingCA - Redwood CityCA - South San FranciscoCA - TurlockCA - Van NuysCA - VeniceCA - West HollywoodCO - AuroraCO - AvonCO - DeltaCO - Fort CollinsCO - LivermoreCO - OlatheFL - CantonmentFL - New Port RicheyGA - AthensGA - DuluthGA - MariettaGA - NorcrossGA - StathamHI - HonoluluHI - KapoleiHI - Pearl CityIA - Fort DodgeIA - MansonIA - Sioux CityID - JeromeIL - AddisonIL - AuroraIL - ChicagoIL - La SalleIL - WheelingIN - FranklinKS - AnthonyKS - AtticaKS - BurlingtonKS - EmporiaKS - LawrenceKS - TonganoxieKY - GeorgetownKY - Stamping GroundLA - FranklinMD - Fort WashingtonMD - HyattsvilleMI - BangorMI - KalamazooMI - PortageMI - WaterfordMO - OwensvilleMO - Saint JamesMO - Saint JosephNC - Chapel HillNC - LexingtonNY - BrooklynNY - New YorkOK - BethanyOK - ChoctawOK - HarrahOK - Oklahoma CityOR - PortlandOR - Saint HelensOR - SalemPA - PittsburghSC - CharlestonSC - NeesesSC - OrangeburgTN - HendersonvilleTN - LoudonTN - NashvilleTX - AmarilloTX - ArlingtonTX - BorgerTX - CanadianTX - Denver CityTX - Fort WorthTX - FrionaTX - HoustonTX - HutchinsTX - LancasterTX - MiamiTX - PasadenaTX - PlanoTX - San AntonioTX - WacoUT - PaysonUT - ProvoUT - SalemUT - Spanish ForkWA - BellevueWA - BremertonWA - SilverdaleWA - SpokaneWI - Shell LakeWY - Powell




Select a record below to get Complete Report
Aliases
Has lived in
Related to




 


View Details


Jim Don BlackAge 87

Don D BlackJames Donald BlackDonald James Black
Chicago, ILAddison, ILWheeling, ILAmarillo, TXCanadian, TXBorger, TX
Sharle BlackGil BlackSandra Washer


 


View Details


Jim A BlackAge 55

Jim Dean BlackJimmie Dean Black
Pearl City, HIHonolulu, HISilverdale, WASaint Joseph, MOBellevue, WABremerton, WA
Amy BlackMariah BlackZach Black


 


View Details


Jim O BlackAge 54

Jim B BlackJim Donald BlackJames O BlackJames Donald Black
Chapel Hill, NCOrangeburg, SCCharleston, SCNeeses, SC
Mildred BlackHenry BlackHeatherblackbur Black


 


View Details


Jim David BlackAge 67

James D BlackJimmy D Black
Waterford, MISalem, ORPortage, MIKalamazoo, MIHyattsville, MDBangor, MI
Ronette BlackLatoya BlackLaurie BlackKenneth BlackRj Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 70

James D Black
Manson, IASioux City, IAFort Dodge, IA
Shelley PeedMary BlackTycha BlackDouglas Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 70

James D BlackJimmy Dale Black
Pittsburgh, PAPowell, WYCantonment, FL
Sonja BlackAaron Black


 


View Details


Jim Douglas BlackAge 51

James Douglas BlackJames A Black
Fort Worth, TXAvon, CO
Julie BlackConnor BlackKaylee Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 66

James D Black
Lawrence, KSTonganoxie, KS
Debra BlackSheila GonserLindsay BlackAnthony Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 74

Jimmy Don BlackJames L Black
Houston, TXPasadena, TX
Patricia BlackBob Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 60

Jimmy Dean Black
Millbrae, CADaly City, CAVenice, CARedwood City, CASouth San Francisco, CA
Lisa BlackGregory Black


 


View Details


Jim David BlackAge 52

James David Black
Duluth, GANorcross, GAMarietta, GAAthens, GAStatham, GA
Paige BlackLauren BlackTremain BlackKatelyn Black


 


View Details


Jim David BlackAge 74

James David BlackJames James Black
Fort Washington, MDSpokane, WAKapolei, HIChoctaw, OKEclectic, ALMillbrook, ALHarrah, OK
Loretta BlackJerry BlackMelissa BlackBarry BlackBetty Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 44

Jimmy Duane Black
Modesto, CAOakdale, CARedding, CAFort Worth, TXTurlock, CAAnthony, KSAtwater, CA
Mary BlackAngela BlackTiffani Black


 


View Details


Jim David BlackAge 59

Jimmy David Black
Nashville, TNHendersonville, TN
Barbara BlackJustin Black


 


View Details


Jim Don BlackAge 63


Miami, TXCanadian, TXFriona, TXAmarillo, TXLakeside, AZ
Sandy BlackBo BlackJames BlackSharle BlackKathy Black


 


View Details


Jim Black


Hope, AR
Charles BlackJoanne Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 64

Jim B BlackJames H BlackJames B Black
Lexington, NC
Anne BlackChase Black


 


View Details


Jim D BlackAge 74

Jimmie Laning Black
Provo, UTSalem, UTSpanish Fork, UTPayson, UT
Lynette BlackBradley BlackShannon Storrs


 


View Details


Jim David BlackAge 49

James David Black
San Antonio, TXWest Hollywood, CAWaco, TXVan Nuys, CA
Joseph BlackDavid BlackXiuyng Shang


 


View Details


Jim Donald BlackAge 66

Jim E BlackJames Donald BlackJimmy Black
Fort Collins, COAurora, COLivermore, COShell Lake, WI
Debbie BlackAndria BlackKasey BlackKyle BlackDana Black




 

PublicRecords360
is designed to help you safely find people and learn about others. PublicRecords360
does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual's eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA.
Learn more about FCRA restrictions. By using our website you agree to our Terms
of Service and Privacy Policy.









© copyright 2012 - 2017 PublicRecords360.com

Home

Notes

Terms

Privacy

Contact















Jim D. Black











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog








Follow Jim D. Black contracts
Click to sign-up for email updates.

      Loading...
    





Home



Sample Contracts



By Executive


Jim D. Black


Jim D. Black

SEC Documents
Filings
Personal financials
Insider transactions
Previous Companies

FNB Bancorp
(OTCBB:FNBG)


Sample Contracts with Jim D. Black



FNB Bancorp –
First National Bank of Northern California Amended and Restated Split Dollar
Life Insurance Agreement
(May 31st, 2016)
THIS SPLIT DOLLAR LIFE INSURANCE AGREEMENT (the "Agreement"), entered into this 27th day of May, 2016, AMENDS AND RESTATES the agreement originally entered into on February 15, 2012, by and between FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA, a national bank organized under the laws of the United States, located in South San Francisco, California (the "Bank"), and JIM D. BLACK (the "Executive").



FNB Bancorp –
First National Bank of Northern California Amended and Restated Executive
Supplemental Compensation Agreement
(May 31st, 2016)
Effective this 1st day of January 2016 ("Effective Date"), this agreement AMENDS AND RESTATES the EXECUTIVE SUPPLEMENTAL COMPENSATION AGREEMENT ("Agreement"), which was originally entered into effective January 1, 2007, and subsequently amended on December 12, 2008, between FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA ("Bank"), a national bank located in South San Francisco, California, and organized under the laws of the United States, and JIM D. BLACK ("Executive"), a member of a select group of management and highly compensated employees of the Bank. The purpose of this amended and restated Agreement is to memorialize certain changes agreed to by the Board and the Executive relating to retirement and change in control.



FNB Bancorp –
First National Bank of Northern California
(May 31st, 2016)
This Management Continuity Agreement ("Agreement") amends and restates in full the original Management Continuity Agreement ("Prior Agreement") entered into between you and FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA, (the "Bank") on July 20, 2000. The Prior Agreement is hereby terminated and has no force or effect. Accordingly, the following terms and conditions shall apply under this new Agreement.



FNB Bancorp –
Memorandum of Mutual Agreement to Amend Certain Salary Continuation Agreements
(December 18th, 2015)
This Memorandum of Mutual Agreement to Amend Certain Salary Continuation Agreements is entered into by First National Bank of Northern California (hereafter referred to as "Employer") and Jim Black, Anthony Clifford, Dave Curtis, and Randy Brugioni (collectively hereafter referred to as "Participant(s)") as of December 18, 2015.



FNB Bancorp –
MERGER AGREEMENT Between AMERICA CALIFORNIA BANK and FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF
NORTHERN CALIFORNIA Under the Charter of First National Bank of Northern
California
(May 15th, 2015)
THIS MERGER AGREEMENT made between FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA (hereinafter referred to as "FNB"), a national banking association organized under the laws of the United States, being located at 975 El Camino Real, South San Francisco, California 94080, with an authorized capital stock of 10,000,000 shares of common stock ("FNB Common Stock"), each of $1.25 par value, and AMERICA CALIFORNIA BANK (hereinafter referred to as "ACB"), a California banking corporation, being located at 417 Montgomery Street, San Francisco, California 94104, with an authorized capital stock of 5,000,000 shares of common stock, no par value ("ACB Common Stock"), and 5,000,000 shares of preferred stock, no par value ("ACB Preferred Stock"), each acting pursuant to a resolution of its board of directors, adopted by the vote of a majority of its directors, pursuant to the authority given by and in accordance with the provisions of 12 USC 215a,



FNB Bancorp –
Second 409A Amendment to the First National Bank of Northern California Salary
Continuation Agreement for Jim Black
(December 24th, 2008)
This Amendment is intended to bring the Agreement into compliance with the requirements of Internal Revenue Code Section 409A. Accordingly, the intent of the parties hereto is that the Agreement shall be operated and interpreted consistent with the requirements of Section 409A. Therefore, the following changes shall be made:



FNB Bancorp –
AMENDMENT NUMBER FIVE TO THE FNB BANCORP SAVINGS PLAN (As Amended and Restated
Effective January 1, 2002)
(March 13th, 2008)
WHEREAS, the original Plan and Trust Agreement was executed as a California Bankers Association Prototype Profit Sharing and Salary Deferral 401(k) Plan, effective January 1, 1976, and was amended and restated effective January 1, 1998, and entitled The First National Bank Savings Plan at that time; and



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(July 26th, 2006)
Exhibit 99.39                                409A Amendment to the                    FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA                         Salary Continuation Agreement for                                  JAMES B. RAMSEY           The FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA ("Company") and JAMES B. RAMSEY ("Executive") originally entered into the FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA Salary Continuation Agreement ("Agreement") on December 31, 1999, which was subsequently amended and restated on December 14, 2001, and September 14, 2004. Pursuant to Section 6.1 of the Agreement, the Company and the Executive hereby adopt this 409A Amendment, effective January 1, 2005.                                      RECITALS                                     --------           This 409A Amendment is intended to bring the Agreement into full compliance with the requirements of Internal Revenue Code Section 409A. In addition, this amendment changes the timing of the Executive



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(July 26th, 2006)
Exhibit 99.37                                409A Amendment to the                    FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA                         Salary Continuation Agreement for                                     JIM BLACK           FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA ("Company") and JIM BLACK ("Executive") originally entered into the FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA Salary Continuation Agreement ("Agreement") on September 14, 2004. Pursuant to Section 6.1 of the Agreement, the Company and the Executive hereby adopt this 409A Amendment, effective January 1, 2005.                                      RECITALS                                     --------           This 409A Amendment is intended to bring the Agreement into full compliance with the requirements of Internal Revenue Code Section 409A.  Therefore, the following changes shall be made:  1.   Section 2.6 shall be added to the Agreement and shall read as follows:           Notwithstanding anything to t



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(March 29th, 2006)
EXHIBIT 10.31                              PORTOLA/FOWLER PROPERTIES                                  LEASE AGREEMENT   ARTICLE ONE:  BASIC TERMS           Section 1.01.  Date of Lease:   July 1, 1999           Section.1.02.  Landlord:        Michael J. Flynn, Gail S. Flynn,                                          Alan Burns, Carol Burns                                          c/o Michael Miyagishima, CCIM                                          P.O. Box 225098                                          San Francisco, CA 94122-5098           Section 1.03.  Tenant:          Sequoia National Bank                                          65 Post Street                                          San Francisco, CA 94101           Section. 1.04. Property: The Property is part of Landlord's multi-tenant building located on the comer of Portola Drive and Fowler Avenue in San Francisco, California. The Leased property is 1325 square feet and is described in Exhibit A and commonly known as 699 Po



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(March 29th, 2006)
Exhibit 10.30                                         LEASE                                       -----         This lease {"Lease"), dated for reference purposes as of May 1, 2003, is made between The Mechanics' Institute, a California Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation ("Landlord") and Sequoia National Bank, a California Corporation ("Tenant"), who agree as follows:  1.     PREMISES         1.1    General: Landlord leases to Tenant and Tenant leases from Landlord premises commonly known as 65 Post Street, San Francisco, California (the "Building"), consisting of approximate1y 2,826 square feet of street level area,approximately 1,322 square feet of basement area, and approximately 1,077 square feet of mezzanine area (plus that portion of the area under the skylight {"Mezzanine Skylight Area" also known as "Atrium w / SkI Inaccessib1e"} if Landlord elects to cover or repair such skylight, which it may do in its sole and absolute discretion), as delineated on the attached Exhibit A (



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(May 2nd, 2005)
Exhibit 2.5                                    SECOND ADDENDUM                                  ---------------                                        TO                                        --                               ACQUISITION AGREEMENT                               ---------------------           THIS SECOND ADDENDUM TO ACQUISITION AGREEMENT, dated as of April 15, 2005, ("Addendum"), is entered into by and among SEQUOIA NATIONAL BANK, a national banking association ("Sequoia"), FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA, a national banking association ("FNB"), HEMISPHERE NATIONAL BANK, a national banking association ("HNB"), PRIVEE FINANCIAL, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Privee"), and SNB INTERIM NATIONAL BANK, an interim national banking association ("Interim Bank").                                      Recitals:                                     --------           A.       Sequoia, FNB, HNB and Privee have entered into a certain                   Acquisition Agreement



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(December 17th, 2004)
Exhibit 2.5                                                                      -----------                                  FIRST ADDENDUM                                  --------------                                        TO                                        --                               ACQUISITION AGREEMENT                               ---------------------            THIS FIRST ADDENDUM TO ACQUISITION AGREEMENT, dated as of December 13, 2004, ("First Addendum"), is entered into by and among SEQUOIA NATIONAL BANK, a national banking association ("Sequoia"), FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA, a national banking association ("FNB"), HEMISPHERE NATIONAL BANK, a national banking association ("HNB"), and PRIVEE FINANCIAL, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Privee").                                      Recitals:                                     --------           A.       Sequoia, FNB and HNB entered into a certain Acquisition                   Agreement, dated as o



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(November 9th, 2004)
Exhibit 2.2                                                                      -----------                                 ACQUISITION AGREEMENT                                     dated as of                                  November 5, 2004                                        among                               SEQUOIA NATIONAL BANK,                     FIRST NATIONAL BANK OF NORTHERN CALIFORNIA                                         and                              HEMISPHERE NATIONAL BANK                                         5                                   Table of Contents                                                                              Page                                      ARTICLE 1                               PLAN OF CONSOLIDATION                               ---------------------  1.1     Plan of Consolidation............................................... 10 1.2     Effective Time...................................................... 11 1.3     



FNB Bancorp –
Contract
(March 30th, 2004)
[GRAPHIC OMITTED] AMERICAN INDUSTRIAL REAL ESTATE ASSOCIATION             STANDARD INDUSTRIAL/COMMERCIAL SINGLE-TENANT LEASE - - NET                  (DO NOT USE THIS FORM FOR MULTI-TENANT BUILDINGS)  1.       Basic Provisions ("Basic Provisions").          1.1   Parties: This Lease ("Lease"), dated for reference purposes only, August 13, 2003 is made by and between Song Development Inc., a California corporation ("Lessor") and First National Bank of Northern California, a California corporation ("Lessee") (collectively the "Parties," or individually a "Party").          1.2   Premises: That certain real property, including all improvements therein or to be provided by Lessor under the terms of this Lease and commonly known as 150 East Third Avenue, San Mateo located in the County of San Mateo state of California, and generally described as (describe briefly the nature of the Property and, if applicable, the "Project", if the property is located within a Project) approximately 4,000 us





Follow Jim D. Black contracts
Click to sign-up for email updates.

      Loading...
    












×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.










Contract and Agreement Category List











































Home
Search
Sign-In/Up
Contracts
Dictionary
Clauses
Companies
People

About
FAQ
Blog







Sample Contract Categories 

a

b

c

d

e

f

g

h

i

j

k

l

m

n

o

p

q

r

s

t

u

v

w

x

y

z


abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz


337k
		Delaware
	

277k
		New York
	

113k
		California
	

70k
		Texas
	

68k
		Agreement
	

62k
		Nevada
	

46k
		Florida
	

44k
		Maryland
	

40k
		Illinois
	

38k
		Employment Agreement
	

38k
		Washington
	

37k
		Amended And Restated
	

36k
		Massachusetts
	

34k
		New Jersey
	

33k
		Pennsylvania
	

28k
		Georgia
	

28k
		Colorado
	

26k
		Ohio
	

25k
		Minnesota
	

25k
		Virginia
	

21k
		North Carolina
	

20k
		Incentive Plan
	

19k
		Credit Agreement
	

19k
		Amendment
	

16k
		Connecticut
	

16k
		Michigan
	

15k
		Indiana
	

14k
		Registration Rights Agreement
	

14k
		Recitals
	

13k
		Tennessee
	

13k
		Arizona
	

13k
		Missouri
	

12k
		Purchase Agreement
	

12k
		Promissory Note
	

12k
		Indenture
	

11k
		Warrant
	

11k
		Louisiana
	

11k
		Kansas
	

11k
		Utah
	

11k
		Wisconsin
	

10k
		Oklahoma
	

9k
		Securities Purchase Agreement
	

9k
		Agreement And Plan Of Merger
	

8k
		Iowa
	

8k
		Supplemental Indenture
	

8k
		Note
	

8k
		Equity Incentive Plan
	

7k
		Kentucky
	

7k
		Stock Purchase Agreement
	

7k
		Alabama
	














×









      Have an account? Sign in here.

Law Insider
Recover your password







No account? Register Now!


No account? Register Now!
Sign in
by using one of this services











or







Forgot your password?


Have an account? Sign in here.
Join Law Insider
for Free
by using one of this services











or







By registering you agree to our
      terms of service.








You are being redirected...
Javascript is required. Please enable javascript before you are allowed to see this page.

You are being redirected...
Javascript is required. Please enable javascript before you are allowed to see this page.






Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey


































 
















Menu
Close

















Our most popular searches:


All recipes


Book A Tour


Make History Today


All Bourbons


Bourbon vs. Whiskey
































    THE BOLD NEW LOOK OF BEAM


                        For seven generations, we have continued to provide the highest quality bourbon in each and every bottle of Jim Beam. This year, we’ll make history again. We’re giving the entire Jim Beam Bourbon portfolio fresh, premium packaging that matches the quality of the liquid inside. Bourbon lovers, get ready for the bold new look of Beam.
                    

































     Now offering:  Distiller’s MasterpiecePersonalized Plaque


                    Aged for many years deep inside the rackhouse then finished in ex-Terry Pedro Ximénez sherry casks to bring out rich fruit notes, Distiller’s Masterpiece is, indeed, a bourbon masterpiece. As such, it deserves to be signed. Not just by its creator, 7th Generation Master Distiller Fred Noe, but by you as well.

Which is why, if you have purchased or are planning to purchase a bottle of Distiller’s Masterpiece, we offer you the chance to do just that.
                


                        Learn More
                    





















    WE’VE MADE HISTORY. NOW MAKE YOURS.


                    As the newest member of the Beam family, Mila Kunis is carrying on a long tradition of doing things our own way. In fact, we age every drop of Jim Beam® twice as long as the law requires for a true Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey. Come be inspired by Mila and the legacy of the Beam family.
                


                        Learn More
                    






























    The world’s finest Bourbons.


                    Jim Beam has a full family of bourbons, each unique and expertly made by the Beam family, who has perfected the art of bourbon making over the last 200 years. Explore what makes each of our products special and worthy of the Beam family name.
                


                        Overview
                    
















    Drink it any damn way you please.


                            From classic to creative, sweet to savory, Jim Beam® offers products that mix perfectly in all types of cocktails. We think it’s about time you make yourself a drink. Explore our wide range of bourbon drink recipes and impress your friends at your next barbecue or house party.
                        


                                All recipes
                            

















Five facts about bourbon.

All bourbon is whiskey, but not all whiskey is bourbon. Why? Because of its unique production process. Read on and learn some of the key facts about bourbon that your buddies may not know.

        Learn more
    






















    A family tradition since 1795.


                    Our bourbon is enjoyed all over the world. But “America’s Native Spirit” is only produced in one location: Kentucky. Come visit us at the Jim Beam American Stillhouse in Clermont, Kentucky, and learn how the world’s #1 bourbon is made.
                


                        Book a tour
                    













                    Meet the family
                













Jim Beam® Original









Jim Beam Black®









Jim Beam® Apple









Jim Beam® Vanilla









Jim Beam® Double Oak









Jim Beam® Devil’s Cut®









Jim Beam® Rye









Jim Beam® Bonded









Jim Beam® Honey









Red Stag by Jim Beam® Black Cherry









Jim Beam® Single Barrel









Jim Beam® Signature Craft Bourbons









Jim Beam® Distiller’s Masterpiece









Jim Beam® Kentucky Fire™









Jim Beam® Maple









Jim Beam® Signature Craft Harvest Bourbon Collection™









Jim Beam Jacob’s Ghost®






























    Become one of the family.


                            To visit the world’s #1 bourbon you must be of legal drinking age. Please drink responsibly.
                        




                                    Month:
                                






                                    Day:
                                






                                    Year:
                                





Enter
By entering you agree to our Terms and Conditions and our updated Privacy Policy.



                                Remember me, please.
                            


                                Oooops, something went wrong. Please try again later.
                            


You’re from


{{ country.name }}



Please select your country.














 














Jim D. Black - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Jim D. Black
Dir. and President at FNB Bancorp


View Full Profile
Are you Jim D. Black? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jim D. Black's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jim D. Black's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jim D. Black's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jim D. Black through your network of contacts.
												








Jim D. Black's Executive Work History


Current


Dir. and President, 
FNB Bancorp


Past
To view Jim D. Black's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
60

 
 


Jim D. Black's Biography




			Director of the Company and First National Bank since March 2002. President of the Company and First National Bank since April 1, 2002. Formerly, Senior Vice President and Senior Lending Officer of First National Bank and an employee since 1981.
		
Source: FNB Bancorp on 05/12/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jim D. Black's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Jim D. Black. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jim D. Black's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jim D. Black's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jim D. Black through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Jim D. Black


















Jim D. Black's Connections (19)





Sign up now to view Jim D. Black's 19 connections »









Edward J. Watson
Board Member, FNB Bancorp









Lisa Angelot
Board Member, FNB Bancorp









Thomas G. Atwood
Board Member, FNB Bancorp









Ronald R. Barels
Board Member, FNB Bancorp









James B. Ramsey
Former Senior Vice President, Chief Financial Officer, FNB Bancorp









Anthony J. Clifford
Dir., Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer, FNB Bancorp









Randy R. Brugioni
Former Senior Vice President and Chief Credit Officer, FNB Bancorp









Charles R. Key
Former Senior Vice President, Director, Information Systems, FNB Bancorp









Thomas C. McGraw
Dir. and Chief Executive Officer, FNB Bancorp









Neil J. Vannucci
Former Board Member, FNB Bancorp








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Jan Koum
Board Member, Facebook, Inc.









Philip L. Milstein
Board Member, The Marcus Corporation












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993















Jim Black Productions                                                                                                    - Hendersonville                                    , TN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



TN



Hendersonville



Motion Picture and Tape Distribution



Motion Picture And Tape Distribution



                            Jim Black Productions
                                    



 





















J 


Jim Black Productions                                                                                                   
CLAIM THIS BUSINESS



115 CHAPARRAL DR HENDERSONVILLE, TN 37075
Get Directions



(615) 446-5555
 





Business Info



 Founded 2010
 Incorporated 
 Annual Revenue $100,000.00
 Employee Count 2
 Industries Motion Picture And Tape Distribution
 Contacts James Black                                                                                                             







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


Jim Black Productions                                                                                                    was founded in 2010, and is located at 115 Chaparral Dr in Hendersonville. Additional information is available at                                                                                                          or by contacting James Black                                                                                                              at (615) 446-5555. 









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







J

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.

















Jim Beam - Wikipedia






















 






Jim Beam

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Jim Beam




Type
Bourbon whiskey


Manufacturer
Beam Suntory


Country of origin
United States


Introduced
1795


Proof (US)
80 and 86


Variants
White label, Green label, Black label; (see below for complete list)


Related products
(see below for list)


Jim Beam is a brand of bourbon whiskey produced in Clermont, Kentucky, by Beam Suntory, a subsidiary of Suntory Holdings of Osaka, Japan. It is one of the best selling brands of bourbon in the world.[1] Since 1795 (interrupted by Prohibition), seven generations of the Beam family have been involved in whiskey production for the company that produces the brand, which was given the name "Jim Beam" in 1933 in honor of James B. Beam, who rebuilt the business after Prohibition ended. Previously produced by the Beam family and later owned by the Fortune Brands holding company, the brand was purchased by Suntory Holdings in 2014.



Contents


1 History
2 Distillers
3 Products
4 Process
5 Food and merchandise
6 Global markets
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
During the late 18th century, members of the Böhm family, who eventually changed the spelling of their surname to "Beam", emigrated from Germany and settled in Kentucky.[2]
Johannes "Reginald" Beam (1760–1834) was a farmer who began producing whiskey in the style that became known as bourbon. Jacob Beam sold his first barrels of corn whiskey around 1795. The whiskey was first called Old Jake Beam Sour Mash, and the distillery was known as Old Tub.[3]
David Beam (1802–1854) took on his father's responsibilities in 1820 at the age of 18, expanding distribution of the family's bourbon during a time of industrial revolution. David M. Beam (1833–1913) in 1854 moved the distillery to Nelson County to capitalize on the growing network of railroad lines connecting states. James Beauregard Beam (1864–1947) managed the family business before and after Prohibition, rebuilding the distillery in 1933 in Clermont, Kentucky, near his Bardstown home. James B. Beam Distilling Company was founded in 1935 by Harry L. Homel, Oliver Jacobson, H. Blum and Jeremiah Beam. From this point forward, the bourbon would be called "Jim Beam Bourbon" after James Beauregard Beam, and some of the bottle labels bear the statement, "None Genuine Without My Signature" with the signature James B. Beam.[citation needed] T. Jeremiah Beam (1899–1977) started working at the Clear Springs distillery in 1913, later becoming the master distiller and overseeing operations at the new Clermont facility. Jeremiah Beam eventually gained full ownership and opened a second distillery near Boston, Kentucky, in 1954. Jeremiah later teamed up with childhood friend Jimberlain Joseph Quinn, to expand the enterprise.
Booker Noe (1929–2004),[4] birth name Frederick Booker Noe II, grandson of Jim Beam, was the Master Distiller at the Jim Beam Distillery for more than 40 years, working closely with Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007). In 1987 Booker introduced his own namesake bourbon, Booker's, the company's first uncut, straight-from-the-barrel bourbon,[citation needed] and the first of the company's "Small Batch Bourbon Collection".
Fred Noe (1957–present), birth name Frederick Booker Noe III, became the seventh generation Beam family distiller in 2007 and regularly travels for promotional purposes.
The Beam family has also played a major role in the history of the Heaven Hill Distillery. All of the Master Distillers at Heaven Hill since its founding have been members of the Beam family. The original Master Distiller at Heaven Hill was Joseph L. Beam, Jim Beam's first cousin. He was followed by his son, Harry, who was followed by Earl Beam, the son of Jim Beam's brother, Park. Earl Beam was then succeeded by the current Heaven Hill Master Distillers, Parker Beam and his son, Craig Beam.
In 1987, Jim Beam purchased National Brands, acquiring brands including Old Crow,[5] Bourbon de Luxe, Old Taylor, Old Grand-Dad, and Sunny Brook.[6] Old Taylor was subsequently sold to the Sazerac Company.
On August 4, 2003, a fire destroyed a Jim Beam aging warehouse in Bardstown, Kentucky. It held about 19,000 barrels of bourbon. Flames rose more than 100 feet from the burning structure. Burning bourbon spilled from the warehouse and set a nearby creek on fire. An estimated 19,000 fish died of the bourbon in the creek and a river.[7]
For some period of time, Jim Beam was part of the holding company formerly known as Fortune Brands that was dismantled in 2011. Other parts of the remaining company were spun off as an IPO on the NYSE on the same day, as Fortune Brands Home & Security, and the liquor division of the holding company was renamed Beam, Inc. on October 4, 2011.
In January 2014, it was announced that Jim Beam would be purchased by Suntory Holdings Ltd., a Japanese group of brewers & distillers known for producing Japan's first whiskey. Suntory agreed to acquire Jim Beam, Maker's Mark, Teacher's Highland Cream and Laphroaig distillery Scotch whiskies for approximately $13.62 billion and also take on Beam's debt. This deal is the biggest Suntory has ever agreed to and will elevate them to the third largest maker of distilled drinks in the world.[8][9] The combined company is expected to have annual sales of spirits products of more than $4.3 billion. Suntory will pay $83.50 per share, a 25 percent premium to Beam's Friday closing price of $66.97. The companies put the deal's value at about $16 billion, including debt. According to press releases regarding the deal, the Illinois-based Jim Beam will continue to be managed by its current leadership. Beam and Suntory unanimously approved the transaction; however, the deal needs to be approved by Beam Inc. stockholders.[10] Pending approval by its shareholders, the deal was expected to close by June 30, 2014.[9] Jim Beam and Suntory have a previous partnership where they would freely distribute each other's brands in different markets.[8]
In October 2016 more than 200 workers went on strike at Jim Beam Distilleries in Clermont and Boston after voting to reject their latest contract offer.[11]
Distillers[edit]
In the history of the brand now known as Jim Beam, there have been seven generations of distillers from the Beam (and Noe) family. Retired Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007) was the first non-Beam to be Master Distiller at the company, and his successor was a member of the family.

Products[edit]




Jim Beam White Label, Beam's high-volume label.


Several varieties bearing the Jim Beam name are available.[12]

Straight Bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Original (white label) – aged 4 years in new charred oak barrels, 80 proof, the flagship whiskey
Jim Beam Choice (green label) – aged 5 years, 80 proof, charcoal filtered
Jim Beam Devil's Cut – aged 6 years,[13] uses extracted bourbon reclaimed from the walls of the cask after pouring, 90 proof
Jim Beam Seven Year (white label, red cap) – aged 7 years, 80 proof
Jim Beam Black (black label) – used to be aged 8 years (aged 6 years in export markets), but dropped the age statement at the beginning of 2015[14] - 86 proof
Jim Beam Bonded (metallic gold label) – aged 4 years, 100 proof, bottled in bond


Signature Craft whiskey


Jim Beam Harvest Collection (limited release) – six bourbons aged 11 years or more, each made with particular grains including triticale, high rye, six-row barley, soft red wheat, brown rice, and whole rolled oat
Jim Beam Signature Craft bourbon whiskey – aged 12 years, 86 proof[15]
Jim Beam Signature Craft whiskey finished with Rare Spanish Brandy – aged 12 years, with Spanish brandy blended into the bourbon - 86 proof
Jim Beam Signature Craft Quarter Cask Bourbon – bourbon aged at least 5 years and finished in a variety of quarter-size casks for at least an additional 4 years
Jim Beam Distiller's Masterpiece - finished in PX sherry casks - 100 proof


Straight rye whiskey


Jim Beam Rye (dark green label) – Rye whiskey, aged 4 years, 90 proof


"White whiskey"


Jacob's Ghost – 80 proof, aged one year in uncharred barrels and filtered


Single-barrel bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Single Barrel – no age statement (aged between 4 and 7 years), chill-filtered (giving it a lighter and clearer quality)[16] - 95 proof (released March 2014)[17]


Blended whiskey


Beam's Eight Star (gold label) – 80 proof, comprising 75% neutral spirits and 25% straight whiskey (on a proof gallon basis)





Red Stag black cherry bourbon liqueur.



Liqueurs


Jim Beam Apple – with apple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Honey – an infusion of "real honey" in the flagship white label bourbon[18] - 70 proof
Jim Beam Maple – with maple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Kentucky Fire – with cinnamon liqueur - 70 proof[19]
"Red Stag by Jim Beam" bourbon liqueurs:

Black Cherry (white label) – 80 proof
Hardcore Cider (green label) – 80 proof
Spiced with Cinnamon (red label) – 80 proof



Several of these offerings have performed quite well at international spirits ratings competitions. For example, Jim Beam's Black label was awarded a gold medal at the 2012 San Francisco World Spirits Competition.[20] Jim Beam Black also won a Gold Outstanding medal at the 2013 International Wine and Spirit Competition.[21]

The Beam "Small Batch Bourbon Collection" consists of several bourbons where the Beam name appears on the labels and marketing materials but is less prominent.

Booker's: aged 6+ years, 120–129.2 proof (60–64.60% ABV)
Baker's: aged 7 years, 107 proof (53.5% ABV)
Basil Hayden's: aged 6 and 8 years, 80 proof (40% ABV); uses the Old Grand-Dad "high-rye" mash bill.
Knob Creek: aged 9 years, 100 proof (50% ABV), with a 9-year, 120-proof (60% ABV) single-barrel expression, and a 100 proof (50% ABV) rye whiskey.



Process[edit]
Bourbon whiskey distillers must follow government standards for production. By law (27 C.F.R. 5), any "straight" bourbon must be: produced in the United States; made of a grain mix of at least 51% corn; distilled at no higher than 160 proof (80% ABV); free of any additives (except water to reduce proof for aging and bottling); aged in new, charred white oak barrels; entered into the aging barrels at no higher than 125 proof (62.5% ABV), aged for a minimum of 2 years, and bottled at no less than 80 proof (40% ABV).
Jim Beam starts with water filtered naturally by the limestone shelf found in Central Kentucky. A strain of yeast used since the end of Prohibition is added to a tank with the grains to create what is known as "dona yeast", used later in the fermentation process. Hammer mills grind the mix of corn, rye and barley malt to break it down for easier cooking. The mix is then moved into a large mash cooker where water and set back are added. The "set back" is a portion of the old mash from the previous distillation—the key step of the sour mash process, ensuring consistency from batch to batch.
From the cooker, the mash heads to the fermenter where it is cooled to 60–70 °F and yeast is added again. The yeast is fed by the sugars in the mash, producing heat, carbon dioxide and alcohol. Called "distiller's beer" or "wash", the resulting liquid (after filtering to remove solids) looks, smells and tastes like (and essentially is) a form of beer. The wash is pumped into a column still where it is heated to over 200 °F, causing the alcohol to turn to a vapor. As the vapor cools and falls it turns to a liquid called "low wine", which measures 125 proof or 62.5% alcohol.[citation needed] A second distillation in a pot still heats and condenses the liquid into "high wine", which reaches 135 proof (67.5% alcohol).[citation needed]
The high wine is moved to new, charred American oak barrels, each of which hold about 53 gallons of liquid. A "bung" is used to seal the barrels before moving them to nearby hilltop rackhouses where they will age up to nine years. As the seasons change, natural weather variations expand and contract the barrel wood, allowing bourbon to seep into the barrel, and the caramelized sugars from the charred oak flavor and color the bourbon. A significant portion (known as the "angel's share") of the 53 gallons of bourbon escapes the barrel through evaporation, or stays trapped in the wood of the barrel.[22] Jim Beam ages for at least four years, or twice as long as the government requires for a "straight" bourbon. At the end of the aging period the amber liquid is filtered, bottled, packaged and sent to one of many distributors around the world using the three-tier distribution system.[citation needed]
Food and merchandise[edit]
On July 26, 2004, THANASI Foods announced the release of Jim Beam Soaked Sunflower Seeds, a snack product soaked in Jim Beam and available in 3 flavors; Original, Barbeque, and Jalapeño. On October 18, 2004, the company announced the addition of Jim Beam Soaked Beef Jerky to the range. Jim Beam has a licensing agreement with Vita Food Products to manufacture and sell Jim Beam BBQ Sauces, Marinades, Mustards, Steak Sauces, Hot Sauce, Wing Sauce, Pancake Syrup and Glazes. Vita Specialty Foods also produces a range of Jim Beam hot smoked and fresh, marinated salmon. Top Shelf Gourmet specializes in Jim Beam bourbon-infused fresh pork and poultry products, including Jim Beam Bourbon Barrel Ham, Pulled Pork, and Pulled Chicken.
Brandmark Products produces a full range of Jim Beam branded billiard and home recreation products. Zippo produces a range of Jim Beam branded pocket and multi-purpose lighters. Bradley Smoker produces a line of Jim Beam branded smokers and smoking briquettes made from Jim Beam Barrels. Silver Buffalo designs Jim Beam wall art, dartboards and accessories for home recreational use. Concept One develops Jim Beam headwear. Headline Entertainment develops Jim Beam T-shirts and outerwear. Sherwood Brands produces a full line of Jim Beam gift sets.[23]
Global markets[edit]
Outside the United States, Beam Global Spirits & Wine has had a sales and distribution alliance with The Edrington Group since 2009. [24]
See also[edit]


Liquor portal
Drink portal



Jack Daniel's, the top-selling American whiskey in the world (a Brown-Forman Tennessee whiskey)
Maker's Mark, a premium sister brand of bourbon produced by Beam Suntory
Robby Gordon Motorsports, racing team sponsored by Jim Beam from 2005 to 2009.

References[edit]


^ Beveragenet Reference URL last accessed April 11, 2008. Archived May 1, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ The History of the Böhm/Beam family (in German)
^ "Beam's History". Beam Suntory. Retrieved September 16, 2016. 
^ Prial, Frank J. (February 27, 2004). "F. Booker Noe II, 74, Master Bourbon Distiller". The New York Times. 
^ "Old Crow Whiskey, a fine Bourbon". whiskeywise.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "National Distillers Products". bottlebooks.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 10 September 2003. 
^ a b "Japan's Suntory buys Jim Beam drinks group in $16bn deal". BBC News Business. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ a b Cane, Jeffery (13 January 2014). "Suntory of Japan to Buy Maker of Jim Beam for $13.6 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Suntory Buying Spirits Maker Beam for $13.62B". The Associated Press. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 15 October 2016. 
^ "Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey Liquor Drinks| Jim Beam Bourbon Whiskey". Jimbeam.com. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Devil's Cut 90 Proof Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Black Extra Aged Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Signature Craft". Retrieved March 19, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Single Barrel Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 23, 2014). "Jim Beam's New Single-Barrel Bourbon Is 95 Proof, and Kid Rock Likes It". BusinessWeek.com. BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 20, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Honey Spirit Drink". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Kentucky Fire". Jim Beam. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Proof66.com Ratings and Review Summary Page for Jim Beam Black". Proof66.com. Retrieved 2012-10-21. 
^ Spirit Details: Jim Beam Black Bourbon Whiskey 8YO
^ Jim Beam Bourbon-Making Process, documented by Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ Active Licensing and Partnership Agreements, Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ "Beam Global Spirits & Wine and The Edrington Group Launch International Sales and Distribution Alliance (press release)". Business Wire. April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 12, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Jim Beam.



Jim Beam official website







v
t
e


Kentucky Bourbon Trail



Primary Trail



Evan Williams Bourbon Experience
Four Roses Distillery
Heaven Hill's Bourbon Heritage Center
Jim Beam Distillery
Maker's Mark Distillery
Stitzel-Weller Distillery
Town Branch Distillery
Wild Turkey Distillery
Woodford Reserve Distillery










Craft Tour



Barrel House Distillery
Corsair Artisan Distillery
Limestone Branch Distillery
MB Roland Distillery
Old Pogue Distillery
Silver Trail Distillery
Wilderness Trail Distillery
Willett Distillery






  Liquor portal








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Jim_Beam&oldid=790203511"					
Categories: Bourbon whiskeyAlcoholic drink brandsDistilleries in KentuckyBeam Suntory1795 introductionsBullitt County, KentuckyKentucky cuisineAmerican brandsHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll Wikipedia articles needing clarificationWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2011Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles with hRecipesArticles with hProductsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2012Articles with unsourced statements from February 2011Articles with unsourced statements from January 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyar日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 12 July 2017, at 07:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Jim Beam - Wikipedia






















 






Jim Beam

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Jim Beam




Type
Bourbon whiskey


Manufacturer
Beam Suntory


Country of origin
United States


Introduced
1795


Proof (US)
80 and 86


Variants
White label, Green label, Black label; (see below for complete list)


Related products
(see below for list)


Jim Beam is a brand of bourbon whiskey produced in Clermont, Kentucky, by Beam Suntory, a subsidiary of Suntory Holdings of Osaka, Japan. It is one of the best selling brands of bourbon in the world.[1] Since 1795 (interrupted by Prohibition), seven generations of the Beam family have been involved in whiskey production for the company that produces the brand, which was given the name "Jim Beam" in 1933 in honor of James B. Beam, who rebuilt the business after Prohibition ended. Previously produced by the Beam family and later owned by the Fortune Brands holding company, the brand was purchased by Suntory Holdings in 2014.



Contents


1 History
2 Distillers
3 Products
4 Process
5 Food and merchandise
6 Global markets
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
During the late 18th century, members of the Böhm family, who eventually changed the spelling of their surname to "Beam", emigrated from Germany and settled in Kentucky.[2]
Johannes "Reginald" Beam (1760–1834) was a farmer who began producing whiskey in the style that became known as bourbon. Jacob Beam sold his first barrels of corn whiskey around 1795. The whiskey was first called Old Jake Beam Sour Mash, and the distillery was known as Old Tub.[3]
David Beam (1802–1854) took on his father's responsibilities in 1820 at the age of 18, expanding distribution of the family's bourbon during a time of industrial revolution. David M. Beam (1833–1913) in 1854 moved the distillery to Nelson County to capitalize on the growing network of railroad lines connecting states. James Beauregard Beam (1864–1947) managed the family business before and after Prohibition, rebuilding the distillery in 1933 in Clermont, Kentucky, near his Bardstown home. James B. Beam Distilling Company was founded in 1935 by Harry L. Homel, Oliver Jacobson, H. Blum and Jeremiah Beam. From this point forward, the bourbon would be called "Jim Beam Bourbon" after James Beauregard Beam, and some of the bottle labels bear the statement, "None Genuine Without My Signature" with the signature James B. Beam.[citation needed] T. Jeremiah Beam (1899–1977) started working at the Clear Springs distillery in 1913, later becoming the master distiller and overseeing operations at the new Clermont facility. Jeremiah Beam eventually gained full ownership and opened a second distillery near Boston, Kentucky, in 1954. Jeremiah later teamed up with childhood friend Jimberlain Joseph Quinn, to expand the enterprise.
Booker Noe (1929–2004),[4] birth name Frederick Booker Noe II, grandson of Jim Beam, was the Master Distiller at the Jim Beam Distillery for more than 40 years, working closely with Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007). In 1987 Booker introduced his own namesake bourbon, Booker's, the company's first uncut, straight-from-the-barrel bourbon,[citation needed] and the first of the company's "Small Batch Bourbon Collection".
Fred Noe (1957–present), birth name Frederick Booker Noe III, became the seventh generation Beam family distiller in 2007 and regularly travels for promotional purposes.
The Beam family has also played a major role in the history of the Heaven Hill Distillery. All of the Master Distillers at Heaven Hill since its founding have been members of the Beam family. The original Master Distiller at Heaven Hill was Joseph L. Beam, Jim Beam's first cousin. He was followed by his son, Harry, who was followed by Earl Beam, the son of Jim Beam's brother, Park. Earl Beam was then succeeded by the current Heaven Hill Master Distillers, Parker Beam and his son, Craig Beam.
In 1987, Jim Beam purchased National Brands, acquiring brands including Old Crow,[5] Bourbon de Luxe, Old Taylor, Old Grand-Dad, and Sunny Brook.[6] Old Taylor was subsequently sold to the Sazerac Company.
On August 4, 2003, a fire destroyed a Jim Beam aging warehouse in Bardstown, Kentucky. It held about 19,000 barrels of bourbon. Flames rose more than 100 feet from the burning structure. Burning bourbon spilled from the warehouse and set a nearby creek on fire. An estimated 19,000 fish died of the bourbon in the creek and a river.[7]
For some period of time, Jim Beam was part of the holding company formerly known as Fortune Brands that was dismantled in 2011. Other parts of the remaining company were spun off as an IPO on the NYSE on the same day, as Fortune Brands Home & Security, and the liquor division of the holding company was renamed Beam, Inc. on October 4, 2011.
In January 2014, it was announced that Jim Beam would be purchased by Suntory Holdings Ltd., a Japanese group of brewers & distillers known for producing Japan's first whiskey. Suntory agreed to acquire Jim Beam, Maker's Mark, Teacher's Highland Cream and Laphroaig distillery Scotch whiskies for approximately $13.62 billion and also take on Beam's debt. This deal is the biggest Suntory has ever agreed to and will elevate them to the third largest maker of distilled drinks in the world.[8][9] The combined company is expected to have annual sales of spirits products of more than $4.3 billion. Suntory will pay $83.50 per share, a 25 percent premium to Beam's Friday closing price of $66.97. The companies put the deal's value at about $16 billion, including debt. According to press releases regarding the deal, the Illinois-based Jim Beam will continue to be managed by its current leadership. Beam and Suntory unanimously approved the transaction; however, the deal needs to be approved by Beam Inc. stockholders.[10] Pending approval by its shareholders, the deal was expected to close by June 30, 2014.[9] Jim Beam and Suntory have a previous partnership where they would freely distribute each other's brands in different markets.[8]
In October 2016 more than 200 workers went on strike at Jim Beam Distilleries in Clermont and Boston after voting to reject their latest contract offer.[11]
Distillers[edit]
In the history of the brand now known as Jim Beam, there have been seven generations of distillers from the Beam (and Noe) family. Retired Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007) was the first non-Beam to be Master Distiller at the company, and his successor was a member of the family.

Products[edit]




Jim Beam White Label, Beam's high-volume label.


Several varieties bearing the Jim Beam name are available.[12]

Straight Bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Original (white label) – aged 4 years in new charred oak barrels, 80 proof, the flagship whiskey
Jim Beam Choice (green label) – aged 5 years, 80 proof, charcoal filtered
Jim Beam Devil's Cut – aged 6 years,[13] uses extracted bourbon reclaimed from the walls of the cask after pouring, 90 proof
Jim Beam Seven Year (white label, red cap) – aged 7 years, 80 proof
Jim Beam Black (black label) – used to be aged 8 years (aged 6 years in export markets), but dropped the age statement at the beginning of 2015[14] - 86 proof
Jim Beam Bonded (metallic gold label) – aged 4 years, 100 proof, bottled in bond


Signature Craft whiskey


Jim Beam Harvest Collection (limited release) – six bourbons aged 11 years or more, each made with particular grains including triticale, high rye, six-row barley, soft red wheat, brown rice, and whole rolled oat
Jim Beam Signature Craft bourbon whiskey – aged 12 years, 86 proof[15]
Jim Beam Signature Craft whiskey finished with Rare Spanish Brandy – aged 12 years, with Spanish brandy blended into the bourbon - 86 proof
Jim Beam Signature Craft Quarter Cask Bourbon – bourbon aged at least 5 years and finished in a variety of quarter-size casks for at least an additional 4 years
Jim Beam Distiller's Masterpiece - finished in PX sherry casks - 100 proof


Straight rye whiskey


Jim Beam Rye (dark green label) – Rye whiskey, aged 4 years, 90 proof


"White whiskey"


Jacob's Ghost – 80 proof, aged one year in uncharred barrels and filtered


Single-barrel bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Single Barrel – no age statement (aged between 4 and 7 years), chill-filtered (giving it a lighter and clearer quality)[16] - 95 proof (released March 2014)[17]


Blended whiskey


Beam's Eight Star (gold label) – 80 proof, comprising 75% neutral spirits and 25% straight whiskey (on a proof gallon basis)





Red Stag black cherry bourbon liqueur.



Liqueurs


Jim Beam Apple – with apple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Honey – an infusion of "real honey" in the flagship white label bourbon[18] - 70 proof
Jim Beam Maple – with maple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Kentucky Fire – with cinnamon liqueur - 70 proof[19]
"Red Stag by Jim Beam" bourbon liqueurs:

Black Cherry (white label) – 80 proof
Hardcore Cider (green label) – 80 proof
Spiced with Cinnamon (red label) – 80 proof



Several of these offerings have performed quite well at international spirits ratings competitions. For example, Jim Beam's Black label was awarded a gold medal at the 2012 San Francisco World Spirits Competition.[20] Jim Beam Black also won a Gold Outstanding medal at the 2013 International Wine and Spirit Competition.[21]

The Beam "Small Batch Bourbon Collection" consists of several bourbons where the Beam name appears on the labels and marketing materials but is less prominent.

Booker's: aged 6+ years, 120–129.2 proof (60–64.60% ABV)
Baker's: aged 7 years, 107 proof (53.5% ABV)
Basil Hayden's: aged 6 and 8 years, 80 proof (40% ABV); uses the Old Grand-Dad "high-rye" mash bill.
Knob Creek: aged 9 years, 100 proof (50% ABV), with a 9-year, 120-proof (60% ABV) single-barrel expression, and a 100 proof (50% ABV) rye whiskey.



Process[edit]
Bourbon whiskey distillers must follow government standards for production. By law (27 C.F.R. 5), any "straight" bourbon must be: produced in the United States; made of a grain mix of at least 51% corn; distilled at no higher than 160 proof (80% ABV); free of any additives (except water to reduce proof for aging and bottling); aged in new, charred white oak barrels; entered into the aging barrels at no higher than 125 proof (62.5% ABV), aged for a minimum of 2 years, and bottled at no less than 80 proof (40% ABV).
Jim Beam starts with water filtered naturally by the limestone shelf found in Central Kentucky. A strain of yeast used since the end of Prohibition is added to a tank with the grains to create what is known as "dona yeast", used later in the fermentation process. Hammer mills grind the mix of corn, rye and barley malt to break it down for easier cooking. The mix is then moved into a large mash cooker where water and set back are added. The "set back" is a portion of the old mash from the previous distillation—the key step of the sour mash process, ensuring consistency from batch to batch.
From the cooker, the mash heads to the fermenter where it is cooled to 60–70 °F and yeast is added again. The yeast is fed by the sugars in the mash, producing heat, carbon dioxide and alcohol. Called "distiller's beer" or "wash", the resulting liquid (after filtering to remove solids) looks, smells and tastes like (and essentially is) a form of beer. The wash is pumped into a column still where it is heated to over 200 °F, causing the alcohol to turn to a vapor. As the vapor cools and falls it turns to a liquid called "low wine", which measures 125 proof or 62.5% alcohol.[citation needed] A second distillation in a pot still heats and condenses the liquid into "high wine", which reaches 135 proof (67.5% alcohol).[citation needed]
The high wine is moved to new, charred American oak barrels, each of which hold about 53 gallons of liquid. A "bung" is used to seal the barrels before moving them to nearby hilltop rackhouses where they will age up to nine years. As the seasons change, natural weather variations expand and contract the barrel wood, allowing bourbon to seep into the barrel, and the caramelized sugars from the charred oak flavor and color the bourbon. A significant portion (known as the "angel's share") of the 53 gallons of bourbon escapes the barrel through evaporation, or stays trapped in the wood of the barrel.[22] Jim Beam ages for at least four years, or twice as long as the government requires for a "straight" bourbon. At the end of the aging period the amber liquid is filtered, bottled, packaged and sent to one of many distributors around the world using the three-tier distribution system.[citation needed]
Food and merchandise[edit]
On July 26, 2004, THANASI Foods announced the release of Jim Beam Soaked Sunflower Seeds, a snack product soaked in Jim Beam and available in 3 flavors; Original, Barbeque, and Jalapeño. On October 18, 2004, the company announced the addition of Jim Beam Soaked Beef Jerky to the range. Jim Beam has a licensing agreement with Vita Food Products to manufacture and sell Jim Beam BBQ Sauces, Marinades, Mustards, Steak Sauces, Hot Sauce, Wing Sauce, Pancake Syrup and Glazes. Vita Specialty Foods also produces a range of Jim Beam hot smoked and fresh, marinated salmon. Top Shelf Gourmet specializes in Jim Beam bourbon-infused fresh pork and poultry products, including Jim Beam Bourbon Barrel Ham, Pulled Pork, and Pulled Chicken.
Brandmark Products produces a full range of Jim Beam branded billiard and home recreation products. Zippo produces a range of Jim Beam branded pocket and multi-purpose lighters. Bradley Smoker produces a line of Jim Beam branded smokers and smoking briquettes made from Jim Beam Barrels. Silver Buffalo designs Jim Beam wall art, dartboards and accessories for home recreational use. Concept One develops Jim Beam headwear. Headline Entertainment develops Jim Beam T-shirts and outerwear. Sherwood Brands produces a full line of Jim Beam gift sets.[23]
Global markets[edit]
Outside the United States, Beam Global Spirits & Wine has had a sales and distribution alliance with The Edrington Group since 2009. [24]
See also[edit]


Liquor portal
Drink portal



Jack Daniel's, the top-selling American whiskey in the world (a Brown-Forman Tennessee whiskey)
Maker's Mark, a premium sister brand of bourbon produced by Beam Suntory
Robby Gordon Motorsports, racing team sponsored by Jim Beam from 2005 to 2009.

References[edit]


^ Beveragenet Reference URL last accessed April 11, 2008. Archived May 1, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ The History of the Böhm/Beam family (in German)
^ "Beam's History". Beam Suntory. Retrieved September 16, 2016. 
^ Prial, Frank J. (February 27, 2004). "F. Booker Noe II, 74, Master Bourbon Distiller". The New York Times. 
^ "Old Crow Whiskey, a fine Bourbon". whiskeywise.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "National Distillers Products". bottlebooks.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 10 September 2003. 
^ a b "Japan's Suntory buys Jim Beam drinks group in $16bn deal". BBC News Business. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ a b Cane, Jeffery (13 January 2014). "Suntory of Japan to Buy Maker of Jim Beam for $13.6 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Suntory Buying Spirits Maker Beam for $13.62B". The Associated Press. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 15 October 2016. 
^ "Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey Liquor Drinks| Jim Beam Bourbon Whiskey". Jimbeam.com. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Devil's Cut 90 Proof Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Black Extra Aged Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Signature Craft". Retrieved March 19, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Single Barrel Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 23, 2014). "Jim Beam's New Single-Barrel Bourbon Is 95 Proof, and Kid Rock Likes It". BusinessWeek.com. BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 20, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Honey Spirit Drink". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Kentucky Fire". Jim Beam. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Proof66.com Ratings and Review Summary Page for Jim Beam Black". Proof66.com. Retrieved 2012-10-21. 
^ Spirit Details: Jim Beam Black Bourbon Whiskey 8YO
^ Jim Beam Bourbon-Making Process, documented by Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ Active Licensing and Partnership Agreements, Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ "Beam Global Spirits & Wine and The Edrington Group Launch International Sales and Distribution Alliance (press release)". Business Wire. April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 12, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Jim Beam.



Jim Beam official website







v
t
e


Kentucky Bourbon Trail



Primary Trail



Evan Williams Bourbon Experience
Four Roses Distillery
Heaven Hill's Bourbon Heritage Center
Jim Beam Distillery
Maker's Mark Distillery
Stitzel-Weller Distillery
Town Branch Distillery
Wild Turkey Distillery
Woodford Reserve Distillery










Craft Tour



Barrel House Distillery
Corsair Artisan Distillery
Limestone Branch Distillery
MB Roland Distillery
Old Pogue Distillery
Silver Trail Distillery
Wilderness Trail Distillery
Willett Distillery






  Liquor portal








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Jim_Beam&oldid=790203511"					
Categories: Bourbon whiskeyAlcoholic drink brandsDistilleries in KentuckyBeam Suntory1795 introductionsBullitt County, KentuckyKentucky cuisineAmerican brandsHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll Wikipedia articles needing clarificationWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2011Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles with hRecipesArticles with hProductsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2012Articles with unsourced statements from February 2011Articles with unsourced statements from January 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyar日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 12 July 2017, at 07:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Jim Beam - Wikipedia






















 






Jim Beam

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Jim Beam




Type
Bourbon whiskey


Manufacturer
Beam Suntory


Country of origin
United States


Introduced
1795


Proof (US)
80 and 86


Variants
White label, Green label, Black label; (see below for complete list)


Related products
(see below for list)


Jim Beam is a brand of bourbon whiskey produced in Clermont, Kentucky, by Beam Suntory, a subsidiary of Suntory Holdings of Osaka, Japan. It is one of the best selling brands of bourbon in the world.[1] Since 1795 (interrupted by Prohibition), seven generations of the Beam family have been involved in whiskey production for the company that produces the brand, which was given the name "Jim Beam" in 1933 in honor of James B. Beam, who rebuilt the business after Prohibition ended. Previously produced by the Beam family and later owned by the Fortune Brands holding company, the brand was purchased by Suntory Holdings in 2014.



Contents


1 History
2 Distillers
3 Products
4 Process
5 Food and merchandise
6 Global markets
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
During the late 18th century, members of the Böhm family, who eventually changed the spelling of their surname to "Beam", emigrated from Germany and settled in Kentucky.[2]
Johannes "Reginald" Beam (1760–1834) was a farmer who began producing whiskey in the style that became known as bourbon. Jacob Beam sold his first barrels of corn whiskey around 1795. The whiskey was first called Old Jake Beam Sour Mash, and the distillery was known as Old Tub.[3]
David Beam (1802–1854) took on his father's responsibilities in 1820 at the age of 18, expanding distribution of the family's bourbon during a time of industrial revolution. David M. Beam (1833–1913) in 1854 moved the distillery to Nelson County to capitalize on the growing network of railroad lines connecting states. James Beauregard Beam (1864–1947) managed the family business before and after Prohibition, rebuilding the distillery in 1933 in Clermont, Kentucky, near his Bardstown home. James B. Beam Distilling Company was founded in 1935 by Harry L. Homel, Oliver Jacobson, H. Blum and Jeremiah Beam. From this point forward, the bourbon would be called "Jim Beam Bourbon" after James Beauregard Beam, and some of the bottle labels bear the statement, "None Genuine Without My Signature" with the signature James B. Beam.[citation needed] T. Jeremiah Beam (1899–1977) started working at the Clear Springs distillery in 1913, later becoming the master distiller and overseeing operations at the new Clermont facility. Jeremiah Beam eventually gained full ownership and opened a second distillery near Boston, Kentucky, in 1954. Jeremiah later teamed up with childhood friend Jimberlain Joseph Quinn, to expand the enterprise.
Booker Noe (1929–2004),[4] birth name Frederick Booker Noe II, grandson of Jim Beam, was the Master Distiller at the Jim Beam Distillery for more than 40 years, working closely with Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007). In 1987 Booker introduced his own namesake bourbon, Booker's, the company's first uncut, straight-from-the-barrel bourbon,[citation needed] and the first of the company's "Small Batch Bourbon Collection".
Fred Noe (1957–present), birth name Frederick Booker Noe III, became the seventh generation Beam family distiller in 2007 and regularly travels for promotional purposes.
The Beam family has also played a major role in the history of the Heaven Hill Distillery. All of the Master Distillers at Heaven Hill since its founding have been members of the Beam family. The original Master Distiller at Heaven Hill was Joseph L. Beam, Jim Beam's first cousin. He was followed by his son, Harry, who was followed by Earl Beam, the son of Jim Beam's brother, Park. Earl Beam was then succeeded by the current Heaven Hill Master Distillers, Parker Beam and his son, Craig Beam.
In 1987, Jim Beam purchased National Brands, acquiring brands including Old Crow,[5] Bourbon de Luxe, Old Taylor, Old Grand-Dad, and Sunny Brook.[6] Old Taylor was subsequently sold to the Sazerac Company.
On August 4, 2003, a fire destroyed a Jim Beam aging warehouse in Bardstown, Kentucky. It held about 19,000 barrels of bourbon. Flames rose more than 100 feet from the burning structure. Burning bourbon spilled from the warehouse and set a nearby creek on fire. An estimated 19,000 fish died of the bourbon in the creek and a river.[7]
For some period of time, Jim Beam was part of the holding company formerly known as Fortune Brands that was dismantled in 2011. Other parts of the remaining company were spun off as an IPO on the NYSE on the same day, as Fortune Brands Home & Security, and the liquor division of the holding company was renamed Beam, Inc. on October 4, 2011.
In January 2014, it was announced that Jim Beam would be purchased by Suntory Holdings Ltd., a Japanese group of brewers & distillers known for producing Japan's first whiskey. Suntory agreed to acquire Jim Beam, Maker's Mark, Teacher's Highland Cream and Laphroaig distillery Scotch whiskies for approximately $13.62 billion and also take on Beam's debt. This deal is the biggest Suntory has ever agreed to and will elevate them to the third largest maker of distilled drinks in the world.[8][9] The combined company is expected to have annual sales of spirits products of more than $4.3 billion. Suntory will pay $83.50 per share, a 25 percent premium to Beam's Friday closing price of $66.97. The companies put the deal's value at about $16 billion, including debt. According to press releases regarding the deal, the Illinois-based Jim Beam will continue to be managed by its current leadership. Beam and Suntory unanimously approved the transaction; however, the deal needs to be approved by Beam Inc. stockholders.[10] Pending approval by its shareholders, the deal was expected to close by June 30, 2014.[9] Jim Beam and Suntory have a previous partnership where they would freely distribute each other's brands in different markets.[8]
In October 2016 more than 200 workers went on strike at Jim Beam Distilleries in Clermont and Boston after voting to reject their latest contract offer.[11]
Distillers[edit]
In the history of the brand now known as Jim Beam, there have been seven generations of distillers from the Beam (and Noe) family. Retired Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007) was the first non-Beam to be Master Distiller at the company, and his successor was a member of the family.

Products[edit]




Jim Beam White Label, Beam's high-volume label.


Several varieties bearing the Jim Beam name are available.[12]

Straight Bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Original (white label) – aged 4 years in new charred oak barrels, 80 proof, the flagship whiskey
Jim Beam Choice (green label) – aged 5 years, 80 proof, charcoal filtered
Jim Beam Devil's Cut – aged 6 years,[13] uses extracted bourbon reclaimed from the walls of the cask after pouring, 90 proof
Jim Beam Seven Year (white label, red cap) – aged 7 years, 80 proof
Jim Beam Black (black label) – used to be aged 8 years (aged 6 years in export markets), but dropped the age statement at the beginning of 2015[14] - 86 proof
Jim Beam Bonded (metallic gold label) – aged 4 years, 100 proof, bottled in bond


Signature Craft whiskey


Jim Beam Harvest Collection (limited release) – six bourbons aged 11 years or more, each made with particular grains including triticale, high rye, six-row barley, soft red wheat, brown rice, and whole rolled oat
Jim Beam Signature Craft bourbon whiskey – aged 12 years, 86 proof[15]
Jim Beam Signature Craft whiskey finished with Rare Spanish Brandy – aged 12 years, with Spanish brandy blended into the bourbon - 86 proof
Jim Beam Signature Craft Quarter Cask Bourbon – bourbon aged at least 5 years and finished in a variety of quarter-size casks for at least an additional 4 years
Jim Beam Distiller's Masterpiece - finished in PX sherry casks - 100 proof


Straight rye whiskey


Jim Beam Rye (dark green label) – Rye whiskey, aged 4 years, 90 proof


"White whiskey"


Jacob's Ghost – 80 proof, aged one year in uncharred barrels and filtered


Single-barrel bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Single Barrel – no age statement (aged between 4 and 7 years), chill-filtered (giving it a lighter and clearer quality)[16] - 95 proof (released March 2014)[17]


Blended whiskey


Beam's Eight Star (gold label) – 80 proof, comprising 75% neutral spirits and 25% straight whiskey (on a proof gallon basis)





Red Stag black cherry bourbon liqueur.



Liqueurs


Jim Beam Apple – with apple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Honey – an infusion of "real honey" in the flagship white label bourbon[18] - 70 proof
Jim Beam Maple – with maple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Kentucky Fire – with cinnamon liqueur - 70 proof[19]
"Red Stag by Jim Beam" bourbon liqueurs:

Black Cherry (white label) – 80 proof
Hardcore Cider (green label) – 80 proof
Spiced with Cinnamon (red label) – 80 proof



Several of these offerings have performed quite well at international spirits ratings competitions. For example, Jim Beam's Black label was awarded a gold medal at the 2012 San Francisco World Spirits Competition.[20] Jim Beam Black also won a Gold Outstanding medal at the 2013 International Wine and Spirit Competition.[21]

The Beam "Small Batch Bourbon Collection" consists of several bourbons where the Beam name appears on the labels and marketing materials but is less prominent.

Booker's: aged 6+ years, 120–129.2 proof (60–64.60% ABV)
Baker's: aged 7 years, 107 proof (53.5% ABV)
Basil Hayden's: aged 6 and 8 years, 80 proof (40% ABV); uses the Old Grand-Dad "high-rye" mash bill.
Knob Creek: aged 9 years, 100 proof (50% ABV), with a 9-year, 120-proof (60% ABV) single-barrel expression, and a 100 proof (50% ABV) rye whiskey.



Process[edit]
Bourbon whiskey distillers must follow government standards for production. By law (27 C.F.R. 5), any "straight" bourbon must be: produced in the United States; made of a grain mix of at least 51% corn; distilled at no higher than 160 proof (80% ABV); free of any additives (except water to reduce proof for aging and bottling); aged in new, charred white oak barrels; entered into the aging barrels at no higher than 125 proof (62.5% ABV), aged for a minimum of 2 years, and bottled at no less than 80 proof (40% ABV).
Jim Beam starts with water filtered naturally by the limestone shelf found in Central Kentucky. A strain of yeast used since the end of Prohibition is added to a tank with the grains to create what is known as "dona yeast", used later in the fermentation process. Hammer mills grind the mix of corn, rye and barley malt to break it down for easier cooking. The mix is then moved into a large mash cooker where water and set back are added. The "set back" is a portion of the old mash from the previous distillation—the key step of the sour mash process, ensuring consistency from batch to batch.
From the cooker, the mash heads to the fermenter where it is cooled to 60–70 °F and yeast is added again. The yeast is fed by the sugars in the mash, producing heat, carbon dioxide and alcohol. Called "distiller's beer" or "wash", the resulting liquid (after filtering to remove solids) looks, smells and tastes like (and essentially is) a form of beer. The wash is pumped into a column still where it is heated to over 200 °F, causing the alcohol to turn to a vapor. As the vapor cools and falls it turns to a liquid called "low wine", which measures 125 proof or 62.5% alcohol.[citation needed] A second distillation in a pot still heats and condenses the liquid into "high wine", which reaches 135 proof (67.5% alcohol).[citation needed]
The high wine is moved to new, charred American oak barrels, each of which hold about 53 gallons of liquid. A "bung" is used to seal the barrels before moving them to nearby hilltop rackhouses where they will age up to nine years. As the seasons change, natural weather variations expand and contract the barrel wood, allowing bourbon to seep into the barrel, and the caramelized sugars from the charred oak flavor and color the bourbon. A significant portion (known as the "angel's share") of the 53 gallons of bourbon escapes the barrel through evaporation, or stays trapped in the wood of the barrel.[22] Jim Beam ages for at least four years, or twice as long as the government requires for a "straight" bourbon. At the end of the aging period the amber liquid is filtered, bottled, packaged and sent to one of many distributors around the world using the three-tier distribution system.[citation needed]
Food and merchandise[edit]
On July 26, 2004, THANASI Foods announced the release of Jim Beam Soaked Sunflower Seeds, a snack product soaked in Jim Beam and available in 3 flavors; Original, Barbeque, and Jalapeño. On October 18, 2004, the company announced the addition of Jim Beam Soaked Beef Jerky to the range. Jim Beam has a licensing agreement with Vita Food Products to manufacture and sell Jim Beam BBQ Sauces, Marinades, Mustards, Steak Sauces, Hot Sauce, Wing Sauce, Pancake Syrup and Glazes. Vita Specialty Foods also produces a range of Jim Beam hot smoked and fresh, marinated salmon. Top Shelf Gourmet specializes in Jim Beam bourbon-infused fresh pork and poultry products, including Jim Beam Bourbon Barrel Ham, Pulled Pork, and Pulled Chicken.
Brandmark Products produces a full range of Jim Beam branded billiard and home recreation products. Zippo produces a range of Jim Beam branded pocket and multi-purpose lighters. Bradley Smoker produces a line of Jim Beam branded smokers and smoking briquettes made from Jim Beam Barrels. Silver Buffalo designs Jim Beam wall art, dartboards and accessories for home recreational use. Concept One develops Jim Beam headwear. Headline Entertainment develops Jim Beam T-shirts and outerwear. Sherwood Brands produces a full line of Jim Beam gift sets.[23]
Global markets[edit]
Outside the United States, Beam Global Spirits & Wine has had a sales and distribution alliance with The Edrington Group since 2009. [24]
See also[edit]


Liquor portal
Drink portal



Jack Daniel's, the top-selling American whiskey in the world (a Brown-Forman Tennessee whiskey)
Maker's Mark, a premium sister brand of bourbon produced by Beam Suntory
Robby Gordon Motorsports, racing team sponsored by Jim Beam from 2005 to 2009.

References[edit]


^ Beveragenet Reference URL last accessed April 11, 2008. Archived May 1, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ The History of the Böhm/Beam family (in German)
^ "Beam's History". Beam Suntory. Retrieved September 16, 2016. 
^ Prial, Frank J. (February 27, 2004). "F. Booker Noe II, 74, Master Bourbon Distiller". The New York Times. 
^ "Old Crow Whiskey, a fine Bourbon". whiskeywise.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "National Distillers Products". bottlebooks.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 10 September 2003. 
^ a b "Japan's Suntory buys Jim Beam drinks group in $16bn deal". BBC News Business. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ a b Cane, Jeffery (13 January 2014). "Suntory of Japan to Buy Maker of Jim Beam for $13.6 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Suntory Buying Spirits Maker Beam for $13.62B". The Associated Press. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 15 October 2016. 
^ "Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey Liquor Drinks| Jim Beam Bourbon Whiskey". Jimbeam.com. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Devil's Cut 90 Proof Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Black Extra Aged Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Signature Craft". Retrieved March 19, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Single Barrel Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 23, 2014). "Jim Beam's New Single-Barrel Bourbon Is 95 Proof, and Kid Rock Likes It". BusinessWeek.com. BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 20, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Honey Spirit Drink". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Kentucky Fire". Jim Beam. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Proof66.com Ratings and Review Summary Page for Jim Beam Black". Proof66.com. Retrieved 2012-10-21. 
^ Spirit Details: Jim Beam Black Bourbon Whiskey 8YO
^ Jim Beam Bourbon-Making Process, documented by Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ Active Licensing and Partnership Agreements, Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ "Beam Global Spirits & Wine and The Edrington Group Launch International Sales and Distribution Alliance (press release)". Business Wire. April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 12, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Jim Beam.



Jim Beam official website







v
t
e


Kentucky Bourbon Trail



Primary Trail



Evan Williams Bourbon Experience
Four Roses Distillery
Heaven Hill's Bourbon Heritage Center
Jim Beam Distillery
Maker's Mark Distillery
Stitzel-Weller Distillery
Town Branch Distillery
Wild Turkey Distillery
Woodford Reserve Distillery










Craft Tour



Barrel House Distillery
Corsair Artisan Distillery
Limestone Branch Distillery
MB Roland Distillery
Old Pogue Distillery
Silver Trail Distillery
Wilderness Trail Distillery
Willett Distillery






  Liquor portal








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Jim_Beam&oldid=790203511"					
Categories: Bourbon whiskeyAlcoholic drink brandsDistilleries in KentuckyBeam Suntory1795 introductionsBullitt County, KentuckyKentucky cuisineAmerican brandsHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll Wikipedia articles needing clarificationWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2011Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles with hRecipesArticles with hProductsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2012Articles with unsourced statements from February 2011Articles with unsourced statements from January 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyar日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 12 July 2017, at 07:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Jim Beam - Wikipedia






















 






Jim Beam

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Jim Beam




Type
Bourbon whiskey


Manufacturer
Beam Suntory


Country of origin
United States


Introduced
1795


Proof (US)
80 and 86


Variants
White label, Green label, Black label; (see below for complete list)


Related products
(see below for list)


Jim Beam is a brand of bourbon whiskey produced in Clermont, Kentucky, by Beam Suntory, a subsidiary of Suntory Holdings of Osaka, Japan. It is one of the best selling brands of bourbon in the world.[1] Since 1795 (interrupted by Prohibition), seven generations of the Beam family have been involved in whiskey production for the company that produces the brand, which was given the name "Jim Beam" in 1933 in honor of James B. Beam, who rebuilt the business after Prohibition ended. Previously produced by the Beam family and later owned by the Fortune Brands holding company, the brand was purchased by Suntory Holdings in 2014.



Contents


1 History
2 Distillers
3 Products
4 Process
5 Food and merchandise
6 Global markets
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
During the late 18th century, members of the Böhm family, who eventually changed the spelling of their surname to "Beam", emigrated from Germany and settled in Kentucky.[2]
Johannes "Reginald" Beam (1760–1834) was a farmer who began producing whiskey in the style that became known as bourbon. Jacob Beam sold his first barrels of corn whiskey around 1795. The whiskey was first called Old Jake Beam Sour Mash, and the distillery was known as Old Tub.[3]
David Beam (1802–1854) took on his father's responsibilities in 1820 at the age of 18, expanding distribution of the family's bourbon during a time of industrial revolution. David M. Beam (1833–1913) in 1854 moved the distillery to Nelson County to capitalize on the growing network of railroad lines connecting states. James Beauregard Beam (1864–1947) managed the family business before and after Prohibition, rebuilding the distillery in 1933 in Clermont, Kentucky, near his Bardstown home. James B. Beam Distilling Company was founded in 1935 by Harry L. Homel, Oliver Jacobson, H. Blum and Jeremiah Beam. From this point forward, the bourbon would be called "Jim Beam Bourbon" after James Beauregard Beam, and some of the bottle labels bear the statement, "None Genuine Without My Signature" with the signature James B. Beam.[citation needed] T. Jeremiah Beam (1899–1977) started working at the Clear Springs distillery in 1913, later becoming the master distiller and overseeing operations at the new Clermont facility. Jeremiah Beam eventually gained full ownership and opened a second distillery near Boston, Kentucky, in 1954. Jeremiah later teamed up with childhood friend Jimberlain Joseph Quinn, to expand the enterprise.
Booker Noe (1929–2004),[4] birth name Frederick Booker Noe II, grandson of Jim Beam, was the Master Distiller at the Jim Beam Distillery for more than 40 years, working closely with Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007). In 1987 Booker introduced his own namesake bourbon, Booker's, the company's first uncut, straight-from-the-barrel bourbon,[citation needed] and the first of the company's "Small Batch Bourbon Collection".
Fred Noe (1957–present), birth name Frederick Booker Noe III, became the seventh generation Beam family distiller in 2007 and regularly travels for promotional purposes.
The Beam family has also played a major role in the history of the Heaven Hill Distillery. All of the Master Distillers at Heaven Hill since its founding have been members of the Beam family. The original Master Distiller at Heaven Hill was Joseph L. Beam, Jim Beam's first cousin. He was followed by his son, Harry, who was followed by Earl Beam, the son of Jim Beam's brother, Park. Earl Beam was then succeeded by the current Heaven Hill Master Distillers, Parker Beam and his son, Craig Beam.
In 1987, Jim Beam purchased National Brands, acquiring brands including Old Crow,[5] Bourbon de Luxe, Old Taylor, Old Grand-Dad, and Sunny Brook.[6] Old Taylor was subsequently sold to the Sazerac Company.
On August 4, 2003, a fire destroyed a Jim Beam aging warehouse in Bardstown, Kentucky. It held about 19,000 barrels of bourbon. Flames rose more than 100 feet from the burning structure. Burning bourbon spilled from the warehouse and set a nearby creek on fire. An estimated 19,000 fish died of the bourbon in the creek and a river.[7]
For some period of time, Jim Beam was part of the holding company formerly known as Fortune Brands that was dismantled in 2011. Other parts of the remaining company were spun off as an IPO on the NYSE on the same day, as Fortune Brands Home & Security, and the liquor division of the holding company was renamed Beam, Inc. on October 4, 2011.
In January 2014, it was announced that Jim Beam would be purchased by Suntory Holdings Ltd., a Japanese group of brewers & distillers known for producing Japan's first whiskey. Suntory agreed to acquire Jim Beam, Maker's Mark, Teacher's Highland Cream and Laphroaig distillery Scotch whiskies for approximately $13.62 billion and also take on Beam's debt. This deal is the biggest Suntory has ever agreed to and will elevate them to the third largest maker of distilled drinks in the world.[8][9] The combined company is expected to have annual sales of spirits products of more than $4.3 billion. Suntory will pay $83.50 per share, a 25 percent premium to Beam's Friday closing price of $66.97. The companies put the deal's value at about $16 billion, including debt. According to press releases regarding the deal, the Illinois-based Jim Beam will continue to be managed by its current leadership. Beam and Suntory unanimously approved the transaction; however, the deal needs to be approved by Beam Inc. stockholders.[10] Pending approval by its shareholders, the deal was expected to close by June 30, 2014.[9] Jim Beam and Suntory have a previous partnership where they would freely distribute each other's brands in different markets.[8]
In October 2016 more than 200 workers went on strike at Jim Beam Distilleries in Clermont and Boston after voting to reject their latest contract offer.[11]
Distillers[edit]
In the history of the brand now known as Jim Beam, there have been seven generations of distillers from the Beam (and Noe) family. Retired Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007) was the first non-Beam to be Master Distiller at the company, and his successor was a member of the family.

Products[edit]




Jim Beam White Label, Beam's high-volume label.


Several varieties bearing the Jim Beam name are available.[12]

Straight Bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Original (white label) – aged 4 years in new charred oak barrels, 80 proof, the flagship whiskey
Jim Beam Choice (green label) – aged 5 years, 80 proof, charcoal filtered
Jim Beam Devil's Cut – aged 6 years,[13] uses extracted bourbon reclaimed from the walls of the cask after pouring, 90 proof
Jim Beam Seven Year (white label, red cap) – aged 7 years, 80 proof
Jim Beam Black (black label) – used to be aged 8 years (aged 6 years in export markets), but dropped the age statement at the beginning of 2015[14] - 86 proof
Jim Beam Bonded (metallic gold label) – aged 4 years, 100 proof, bottled in bond


Signature Craft whiskey


Jim Beam Harvest Collection (limited release) – six bourbons aged 11 years or more, each made with particular grains including triticale, high rye, six-row barley, soft red wheat, brown rice, and whole rolled oat
Jim Beam Signature Craft bourbon whiskey – aged 12 years, 86 proof[15]
Jim Beam Signature Craft whiskey finished with Rare Spanish Brandy – aged 12 years, with Spanish brandy blended into the bourbon - 86 proof
Jim Beam Signature Craft Quarter Cask Bourbon – bourbon aged at least 5 years and finished in a variety of quarter-size casks for at least an additional 4 years
Jim Beam Distiller's Masterpiece - finished in PX sherry casks - 100 proof


Straight rye whiskey


Jim Beam Rye (dark green label) – Rye whiskey, aged 4 years, 90 proof


"White whiskey"


Jacob's Ghost – 80 proof, aged one year in uncharred barrels and filtered


Single-barrel bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Single Barrel – no age statement (aged between 4 and 7 years), chill-filtered (giving it a lighter and clearer quality)[16] - 95 proof (released March 2014)[17]


Blended whiskey


Beam's Eight Star (gold label) – 80 proof, comprising 75% neutral spirits and 25% straight whiskey (on a proof gallon basis)





Red Stag black cherry bourbon liqueur.



Liqueurs


Jim Beam Apple – with apple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Honey – an infusion of "real honey" in the flagship white label bourbon[18] - 70 proof
Jim Beam Maple – with maple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Kentucky Fire – with cinnamon liqueur - 70 proof[19]
"Red Stag by Jim Beam" bourbon liqueurs:

Black Cherry (white label) – 80 proof
Hardcore Cider (green label) – 80 proof
Spiced with Cinnamon (red label) – 80 proof



Several of these offerings have performed quite well at international spirits ratings competitions. For example, Jim Beam's Black label was awarded a gold medal at the 2012 San Francisco World Spirits Competition.[20] Jim Beam Black also won a Gold Outstanding medal at the 2013 International Wine and Spirit Competition.[21]

The Beam "Small Batch Bourbon Collection" consists of several bourbons where the Beam name appears on the labels and marketing materials but is less prominent.

Booker's: aged 6+ years, 120–129.2 proof (60–64.60% ABV)
Baker's: aged 7 years, 107 proof (53.5% ABV)
Basil Hayden's: aged 6 and 8 years, 80 proof (40% ABV); uses the Old Grand-Dad "high-rye" mash bill.
Knob Creek: aged 9 years, 100 proof (50% ABV), with a 9-year, 120-proof (60% ABV) single-barrel expression, and a 100 proof (50% ABV) rye whiskey.



Process[edit]
Bourbon whiskey distillers must follow government standards for production. By law (27 C.F.R. 5), any "straight" bourbon must be: produced in the United States; made of a grain mix of at least 51% corn; distilled at no higher than 160 proof (80% ABV); free of any additives (except water to reduce proof for aging and bottling); aged in new, charred white oak barrels; entered into the aging barrels at no higher than 125 proof (62.5% ABV), aged for a minimum of 2 years, and bottled at no less than 80 proof (40% ABV).
Jim Beam starts with water filtered naturally by the limestone shelf found in Central Kentucky. A strain of yeast used since the end of Prohibition is added to a tank with the grains to create what is known as "dona yeast", used later in the fermentation process. Hammer mills grind the mix of corn, rye and barley malt to break it down for easier cooking. The mix is then moved into a large mash cooker where water and set back are added. The "set back" is a portion of the old mash from the previous distillation—the key step of the sour mash process, ensuring consistency from batch to batch.
From the cooker, the mash heads to the fermenter where it is cooled to 60–70 °F and yeast is added again. The yeast is fed by the sugars in the mash, producing heat, carbon dioxide and alcohol. Called "distiller's beer" or "wash", the resulting liquid (after filtering to remove solids) looks, smells and tastes like (and essentially is) a form of beer. The wash is pumped into a column still where it is heated to over 200 °F, causing the alcohol to turn to a vapor. As the vapor cools and falls it turns to a liquid called "low wine", which measures 125 proof or 62.5% alcohol.[citation needed] A second distillation in a pot still heats and condenses the liquid into "high wine", which reaches 135 proof (67.5% alcohol).[citation needed]
The high wine is moved to new, charred American oak barrels, each of which hold about 53 gallons of liquid. A "bung" is used to seal the barrels before moving them to nearby hilltop rackhouses where they will age up to nine years. As the seasons change, natural weather variations expand and contract the barrel wood, allowing bourbon to seep into the barrel, and the caramelized sugars from the charred oak flavor and color the bourbon. A significant portion (known as the "angel's share") of the 53 gallons of bourbon escapes the barrel through evaporation, or stays trapped in the wood of the barrel.[22] Jim Beam ages for at least four years, or twice as long as the government requires for a "straight" bourbon. At the end of the aging period the amber liquid is filtered, bottled, packaged and sent to one of many distributors around the world using the three-tier distribution system.[citation needed]
Food and merchandise[edit]
On July 26, 2004, THANASI Foods announced the release of Jim Beam Soaked Sunflower Seeds, a snack product soaked in Jim Beam and available in 3 flavors; Original, Barbeque, and Jalapeño. On October 18, 2004, the company announced the addition of Jim Beam Soaked Beef Jerky to the range. Jim Beam has a licensing agreement with Vita Food Products to manufacture and sell Jim Beam BBQ Sauces, Marinades, Mustards, Steak Sauces, Hot Sauce, Wing Sauce, Pancake Syrup and Glazes. Vita Specialty Foods also produces a range of Jim Beam hot smoked and fresh, marinated salmon. Top Shelf Gourmet specializes in Jim Beam bourbon-infused fresh pork and poultry products, including Jim Beam Bourbon Barrel Ham, Pulled Pork, and Pulled Chicken.
Brandmark Products produces a full range of Jim Beam branded billiard and home recreation products. Zippo produces a range of Jim Beam branded pocket and multi-purpose lighters. Bradley Smoker produces a line of Jim Beam branded smokers and smoking briquettes made from Jim Beam Barrels. Silver Buffalo designs Jim Beam wall art, dartboards and accessories for home recreational use. Concept One develops Jim Beam headwear. Headline Entertainment develops Jim Beam T-shirts and outerwear. Sherwood Brands produces a full line of Jim Beam gift sets.[23]
Global markets[edit]
Outside the United States, Beam Global Spirits & Wine has had a sales and distribution alliance with The Edrington Group since 2009. [24]
See also[edit]


Liquor portal
Drink portal



Jack Daniel's, the top-selling American whiskey in the world (a Brown-Forman Tennessee whiskey)
Maker's Mark, a premium sister brand of bourbon produced by Beam Suntory
Robby Gordon Motorsports, racing team sponsored by Jim Beam from 2005 to 2009.

References[edit]


^ Beveragenet Reference URL last accessed April 11, 2008. Archived May 1, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ The History of the Böhm/Beam family (in German)
^ "Beam's History". Beam Suntory. Retrieved September 16, 2016. 
^ Prial, Frank J. (February 27, 2004). "F. Booker Noe II, 74, Master Bourbon Distiller". The New York Times. 
^ "Old Crow Whiskey, a fine Bourbon". whiskeywise.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "National Distillers Products". bottlebooks.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 10 September 2003. 
^ a b "Japan's Suntory buys Jim Beam drinks group in $16bn deal". BBC News Business. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ a b Cane, Jeffery (13 January 2014). "Suntory of Japan to Buy Maker of Jim Beam for $13.6 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Suntory Buying Spirits Maker Beam for $13.62B". The Associated Press. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 15 October 2016. 
^ "Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey Liquor Drinks| Jim Beam Bourbon Whiskey". Jimbeam.com. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Devil's Cut 90 Proof Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Black Extra Aged Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Signature Craft". Retrieved March 19, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Single Barrel Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 23, 2014). "Jim Beam's New Single-Barrel Bourbon Is 95 Proof, and Kid Rock Likes It". BusinessWeek.com. BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 20, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Honey Spirit Drink". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Kentucky Fire". Jim Beam. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Proof66.com Ratings and Review Summary Page for Jim Beam Black". Proof66.com. Retrieved 2012-10-21. 
^ Spirit Details: Jim Beam Black Bourbon Whiskey 8YO
^ Jim Beam Bourbon-Making Process, documented by Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ Active Licensing and Partnership Agreements, Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ "Beam Global Spirits & Wine and The Edrington Group Launch International Sales and Distribution Alliance (press release)". Business Wire. April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 12, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Jim Beam.



Jim Beam official website







v
t
e


Kentucky Bourbon Trail



Primary Trail



Evan Williams Bourbon Experience
Four Roses Distillery
Heaven Hill's Bourbon Heritage Center
Jim Beam Distillery
Maker's Mark Distillery
Stitzel-Weller Distillery
Town Branch Distillery
Wild Turkey Distillery
Woodford Reserve Distillery










Craft Tour



Barrel House Distillery
Corsair Artisan Distillery
Limestone Branch Distillery
MB Roland Distillery
Old Pogue Distillery
Silver Trail Distillery
Wilderness Trail Distillery
Willett Distillery






  Liquor portal








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Jim_Beam&oldid=790203511"					
Categories: Bourbon whiskeyAlcoholic drink brandsDistilleries in KentuckyBeam Suntory1795 introductionsBullitt County, KentuckyKentucky cuisineAmerican brandsHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll Wikipedia articles needing clarificationWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2011Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles with hRecipesArticles with hProductsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2012Articles with unsourced statements from February 2011Articles with unsourced statements from January 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyar日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 12 July 2017, at 07:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Jim Beam - Wikipedia






















 






Jim Beam

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Jim Beam




Type
Bourbon whiskey


Manufacturer
Beam Suntory


Country of origin
United States


Introduced
1795


Proof (US)
80 and 86


Variants
White label, Green label, Black label; (see below for complete list)


Related products
(see below for list)


Jim Beam is a brand of bourbon whiskey produced in Clermont, Kentucky, by Beam Suntory, a subsidiary of Suntory Holdings of Osaka, Japan. It is one of the best selling brands of bourbon in the world.[1] Since 1795 (interrupted by Prohibition), seven generations of the Beam family have been involved in whiskey production for the company that produces the brand, which was given the name "Jim Beam" in 1933 in honor of James B. Beam, who rebuilt the business after Prohibition ended. Previously produced by the Beam family and later owned by the Fortune Brands holding company, the brand was purchased by Suntory Holdings in 2014.



Contents


1 History
2 Distillers
3 Products
4 Process
5 Food and merchandise
6 Global markets
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
During the late 18th century, members of the Böhm family, who eventually changed the spelling of their surname to "Beam", emigrated from Germany and settled in Kentucky.[2]
Johannes "Reginald" Beam (1760–1834) was a farmer who began producing whiskey in the style that became known as bourbon. Jacob Beam sold his first barrels of corn whiskey around 1795. The whiskey was first called Old Jake Beam Sour Mash, and the distillery was known as Old Tub.[3]
David Beam (1802–1854) took on his father's responsibilities in 1820 at the age of 18, expanding distribution of the family's bourbon during a time of industrial revolution. David M. Beam (1833–1913) in 1854 moved the distillery to Nelson County to capitalize on the growing network of railroad lines connecting states. James Beauregard Beam (1864–1947) managed the family business before and after Prohibition, rebuilding the distillery in 1933 in Clermont, Kentucky, near his Bardstown home. James B. Beam Distilling Company was founded in 1935 by Harry L. Homel, Oliver Jacobson, H. Blum and Jeremiah Beam. From this point forward, the bourbon would be called "Jim Beam Bourbon" after James Beauregard Beam, and some of the bottle labels bear the statement, "None Genuine Without My Signature" with the signature James B. Beam.[citation needed] T. Jeremiah Beam (1899–1977) started working at the Clear Springs distillery in 1913, later becoming the master distiller and overseeing operations at the new Clermont facility. Jeremiah Beam eventually gained full ownership and opened a second distillery near Boston, Kentucky, in 1954. Jeremiah later teamed up with childhood friend Jimberlain Joseph Quinn, to expand the enterprise.
Booker Noe (1929–2004),[4] birth name Frederick Booker Noe II, grandson of Jim Beam, was the Master Distiller at the Jim Beam Distillery for more than 40 years, working closely with Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007). In 1987 Booker introduced his own namesake bourbon, Booker's, the company's first uncut, straight-from-the-barrel bourbon,[citation needed] and the first of the company's "Small Batch Bourbon Collection".
Fred Noe (1957–present), birth name Frederick Booker Noe III, became the seventh generation Beam family distiller in 2007 and regularly travels for promotional purposes.
The Beam family has also played a major role in the history of the Heaven Hill Distillery. All of the Master Distillers at Heaven Hill since its founding have been members of the Beam family. The original Master Distiller at Heaven Hill was Joseph L. Beam, Jim Beam's first cousin. He was followed by his son, Harry, who was followed by Earl Beam, the son of Jim Beam's brother, Park. Earl Beam was then succeeded by the current Heaven Hill Master Distillers, Parker Beam and his son, Craig Beam.
In 1987, Jim Beam purchased National Brands, acquiring brands including Old Crow,[5] Bourbon de Luxe, Old Taylor, Old Grand-Dad, and Sunny Brook.[6] Old Taylor was subsequently sold to the Sazerac Company.
On August 4, 2003, a fire destroyed a Jim Beam aging warehouse in Bardstown, Kentucky. It held about 19,000 barrels of bourbon. Flames rose more than 100 feet from the burning structure. Burning bourbon spilled from the warehouse and set a nearby creek on fire. An estimated 19,000 fish died of the bourbon in the creek and a river.[7]
For some period of time, Jim Beam was part of the holding company formerly known as Fortune Brands that was dismantled in 2011. Other parts of the remaining company were spun off as an IPO on the NYSE on the same day, as Fortune Brands Home & Security, and the liquor division of the holding company was renamed Beam, Inc. on October 4, 2011.
In January 2014, it was announced that Jim Beam would be purchased by Suntory Holdings Ltd., a Japanese group of brewers & distillers known for producing Japan's first whiskey. Suntory agreed to acquire Jim Beam, Maker's Mark, Teacher's Highland Cream and Laphroaig distillery Scotch whiskies for approximately $13.62 billion and also take on Beam's debt. This deal is the biggest Suntory has ever agreed to and will elevate them to the third largest maker of distilled drinks in the world.[8][9] The combined company is expected to have annual sales of spirits products of more than $4.3 billion. Suntory will pay $83.50 per share, a 25 percent premium to Beam's Friday closing price of $66.97. The companies put the deal's value at about $16 billion, including debt. According to press releases regarding the deal, the Illinois-based Jim Beam will continue to be managed by its current leadership. Beam and Suntory unanimously approved the transaction; however, the deal needs to be approved by Beam Inc. stockholders.[10] Pending approval by its shareholders, the deal was expected to close by June 30, 2014.[9] Jim Beam and Suntory have a previous partnership where they would freely distribute each other's brands in different markets.[8]
In October 2016 more than 200 workers went on strike at Jim Beam Distilleries in Clermont and Boston after voting to reject their latest contract offer.[11]
Distillers[edit]
In the history of the brand now known as Jim Beam, there have been seven generations of distillers from the Beam (and Noe) family. Retired Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007) was the first non-Beam to be Master Distiller at the company, and his successor was a member of the family.

Products[edit]




Jim Beam White Label, Beam's high-volume label.


Several varieties bearing the Jim Beam name are available.[12]

Straight Bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Original (white label) – aged 4 years in new charred oak barrels, 80 proof, the flagship whiskey
Jim Beam Choice (green label) – aged 5 years, 80 proof, charcoal filtered
Jim Beam Devil's Cut – aged 6 years,[13] uses extracted bourbon reclaimed from the walls of the cask after pouring, 90 proof
Jim Beam Seven Year (white label, red cap) – aged 7 years, 80 proof
Jim Beam Black (black label) – used to be aged 8 years (aged 6 years in export markets), but dropped the age statement at the beginning of 2015[14] - 86 proof
Jim Beam Bonded (metallic gold label) – aged 4 years, 100 proof, bottled in bond


Signature Craft whiskey


Jim Beam Harvest Collection (limited release) – six bourbons aged 11 years or more, each made with particular grains including triticale, high rye, six-row barley, soft red wheat, brown rice, and whole rolled oat
Jim Beam Signature Craft bourbon whiskey – aged 12 years, 86 proof[15]
Jim Beam Signature Craft whiskey finished with Rare Spanish Brandy – aged 12 years, with Spanish brandy blended into the bourbon - 86 proof
Jim Beam Signature Craft Quarter Cask Bourbon – bourbon aged at least 5 years and finished in a variety of quarter-size casks for at least an additional 4 years
Jim Beam Distiller's Masterpiece - finished in PX sherry casks - 100 proof


Straight rye whiskey


Jim Beam Rye (dark green label) – Rye whiskey, aged 4 years, 90 proof


"White whiskey"


Jacob's Ghost – 80 proof, aged one year in uncharred barrels and filtered


Single-barrel bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Single Barrel – no age statement (aged between 4 and 7 years), chill-filtered (giving it a lighter and clearer quality)[16] - 95 proof (released March 2014)[17]


Blended whiskey


Beam's Eight Star (gold label) – 80 proof, comprising 75% neutral spirits and 25% straight whiskey (on a proof gallon basis)





Red Stag black cherry bourbon liqueur.



Liqueurs


Jim Beam Apple – with apple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Honey – an infusion of "real honey" in the flagship white label bourbon[18] - 70 proof
Jim Beam Maple – with maple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Kentucky Fire – with cinnamon liqueur - 70 proof[19]
"Red Stag by Jim Beam" bourbon liqueurs:

Black Cherry (white label) – 80 proof
Hardcore Cider (green label) – 80 proof
Spiced with Cinnamon (red label) – 80 proof



Several of these offerings have performed quite well at international spirits ratings competitions. For example, Jim Beam's Black label was awarded a gold medal at the 2012 San Francisco World Spirits Competition.[20] Jim Beam Black also won a Gold Outstanding medal at the 2013 International Wine and Spirit Competition.[21]

The Beam "Small Batch Bourbon Collection" consists of several bourbons where the Beam name appears on the labels and marketing materials but is less prominent.

Booker's: aged 6+ years, 120–129.2 proof (60–64.60% ABV)
Baker's: aged 7 years, 107 proof (53.5% ABV)
Basil Hayden's: aged 6 and 8 years, 80 proof (40% ABV); uses the Old Grand-Dad "high-rye" mash bill.
Knob Creek: aged 9 years, 100 proof (50% ABV), with a 9-year, 120-proof (60% ABV) single-barrel expression, and a 100 proof (50% ABV) rye whiskey.



Process[edit]
Bourbon whiskey distillers must follow government standards for production. By law (27 C.F.R. 5), any "straight" bourbon must be: produced in the United States; made of a grain mix of at least 51% corn; distilled at no higher than 160 proof (80% ABV); free of any additives (except water to reduce proof for aging and bottling); aged in new, charred white oak barrels; entered into the aging barrels at no higher than 125 proof (62.5% ABV), aged for a minimum of 2 years, and bottled at no less than 80 proof (40% ABV).
Jim Beam starts with water filtered naturally by the limestone shelf found in Central Kentucky. A strain of yeast used since the end of Prohibition is added to a tank with the grains to create what is known as "dona yeast", used later in the fermentation process. Hammer mills grind the mix of corn, rye and barley malt to break it down for easier cooking. The mix is then moved into a large mash cooker where water and set back are added. The "set back" is a portion of the old mash from the previous distillation—the key step of the sour mash process, ensuring consistency from batch to batch.
From the cooker, the mash heads to the fermenter where it is cooled to 60–70 °F and yeast is added again. The yeast is fed by the sugars in the mash, producing heat, carbon dioxide and alcohol. Called "distiller's beer" or "wash", the resulting liquid (after filtering to remove solids) looks, smells and tastes like (and essentially is) a form of beer. The wash is pumped into a column still where it is heated to over 200 °F, causing the alcohol to turn to a vapor. As the vapor cools and falls it turns to a liquid called "low wine", which measures 125 proof or 62.5% alcohol.[citation needed] A second distillation in a pot still heats and condenses the liquid into "high wine", which reaches 135 proof (67.5% alcohol).[citation needed]
The high wine is moved to new, charred American oak barrels, each of which hold about 53 gallons of liquid. A "bung" is used to seal the barrels before moving them to nearby hilltop rackhouses where they will age up to nine years. As the seasons change, natural weather variations expand and contract the barrel wood, allowing bourbon to seep into the barrel, and the caramelized sugars from the charred oak flavor and color the bourbon. A significant portion (known as the "angel's share") of the 53 gallons of bourbon escapes the barrel through evaporation, or stays trapped in the wood of the barrel.[22] Jim Beam ages for at least four years, or twice as long as the government requires for a "straight" bourbon. At the end of the aging period the amber liquid is filtered, bottled, packaged and sent to one of many distributors around the world using the three-tier distribution system.[citation needed]
Food and merchandise[edit]
On July 26, 2004, THANASI Foods announced the release of Jim Beam Soaked Sunflower Seeds, a snack product soaked in Jim Beam and available in 3 flavors; Original, Barbeque, and Jalapeño. On October 18, 2004, the company announced the addition of Jim Beam Soaked Beef Jerky to the range. Jim Beam has a licensing agreement with Vita Food Products to manufacture and sell Jim Beam BBQ Sauces, Marinades, Mustards, Steak Sauces, Hot Sauce, Wing Sauce, Pancake Syrup and Glazes. Vita Specialty Foods also produces a range of Jim Beam hot smoked and fresh, marinated salmon. Top Shelf Gourmet specializes in Jim Beam bourbon-infused fresh pork and poultry products, including Jim Beam Bourbon Barrel Ham, Pulled Pork, and Pulled Chicken.
Brandmark Products produces a full range of Jim Beam branded billiard and home recreation products. Zippo produces a range of Jim Beam branded pocket and multi-purpose lighters. Bradley Smoker produces a line of Jim Beam branded smokers and smoking briquettes made from Jim Beam Barrels. Silver Buffalo designs Jim Beam wall art, dartboards and accessories for home recreational use. Concept One develops Jim Beam headwear. Headline Entertainment develops Jim Beam T-shirts and outerwear. Sherwood Brands produces a full line of Jim Beam gift sets.[23]
Global markets[edit]
Outside the United States, Beam Global Spirits & Wine has had a sales and distribution alliance with The Edrington Group since 2009. [24]
See also[edit]


Liquor portal
Drink portal



Jack Daniel's, the top-selling American whiskey in the world (a Brown-Forman Tennessee whiskey)
Maker's Mark, a premium sister brand of bourbon produced by Beam Suntory
Robby Gordon Motorsports, racing team sponsored by Jim Beam from 2005 to 2009.

References[edit]


^ Beveragenet Reference URL last accessed April 11, 2008. Archived May 1, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ The History of the Böhm/Beam family (in German)
^ "Beam's History". Beam Suntory. Retrieved September 16, 2016. 
^ Prial, Frank J. (February 27, 2004). "F. Booker Noe II, 74, Master Bourbon Distiller". The New York Times. 
^ "Old Crow Whiskey, a fine Bourbon". whiskeywise.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "National Distillers Products". bottlebooks.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 10 September 2003. 
^ a b "Japan's Suntory buys Jim Beam drinks group in $16bn deal". BBC News Business. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ a b Cane, Jeffery (13 January 2014). "Suntory of Japan to Buy Maker of Jim Beam for $13.6 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Suntory Buying Spirits Maker Beam for $13.62B". The Associated Press. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 15 October 2016. 
^ "Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey Liquor Drinks| Jim Beam Bourbon Whiskey". Jimbeam.com. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Devil's Cut 90 Proof Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Black Extra Aged Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Signature Craft". Retrieved March 19, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Single Barrel Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 23, 2014). "Jim Beam's New Single-Barrel Bourbon Is 95 Proof, and Kid Rock Likes It". BusinessWeek.com. BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 20, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Honey Spirit Drink". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Kentucky Fire". Jim Beam. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Proof66.com Ratings and Review Summary Page for Jim Beam Black". Proof66.com. Retrieved 2012-10-21. 
^ Spirit Details: Jim Beam Black Bourbon Whiskey 8YO
^ Jim Beam Bourbon-Making Process, documented by Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ Active Licensing and Partnership Agreements, Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ "Beam Global Spirits & Wine and The Edrington Group Launch International Sales and Distribution Alliance (press release)". Business Wire. April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 12, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Jim Beam.



Jim Beam official website







v
t
e


Kentucky Bourbon Trail



Primary Trail



Evan Williams Bourbon Experience
Four Roses Distillery
Heaven Hill's Bourbon Heritage Center
Jim Beam Distillery
Maker's Mark Distillery
Stitzel-Weller Distillery
Town Branch Distillery
Wild Turkey Distillery
Woodford Reserve Distillery










Craft Tour



Barrel House Distillery
Corsair Artisan Distillery
Limestone Branch Distillery
MB Roland Distillery
Old Pogue Distillery
Silver Trail Distillery
Wilderness Trail Distillery
Willett Distillery






  Liquor portal








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Jim_Beam&oldid=790203511"					
Categories: Bourbon whiskeyAlcoholic drink brandsDistilleries in KentuckyBeam Suntory1795 introductionsBullitt County, KentuckyKentucky cuisineAmerican brandsHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll Wikipedia articles needing clarificationWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2011Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles with hRecipesArticles with hProductsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2012Articles with unsourced statements from February 2011Articles with unsourced statements from January 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyar日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 12 July 2017, at 07:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Jim Beam - Wikipedia






















 






Jim Beam

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Jim Beam




Type
Bourbon whiskey


Manufacturer
Beam Suntory


Country of origin
United States


Introduced
1795


Proof (US)
80 and 86


Variants
White label, Green label, Black label; (see below for complete list)


Related products
(see below for list)


Jim Beam is a brand of bourbon whiskey produced in Clermont, Kentucky, by Beam Suntory, a subsidiary of Suntory Holdings of Osaka, Japan. It is one of the best selling brands of bourbon in the world.[1] Since 1795 (interrupted by Prohibition), seven generations of the Beam family have been involved in whiskey production for the company that produces the brand, which was given the name "Jim Beam" in 1933 in honor of James B. Beam, who rebuilt the business after Prohibition ended. Previously produced by the Beam family and later owned by the Fortune Brands holding company, the brand was purchased by Suntory Holdings in 2014.



Contents


1 History
2 Distillers
3 Products
4 Process
5 Food and merchandise
6 Global markets
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
During the late 18th century, members of the Böhm family, who eventually changed the spelling of their surname to "Beam", emigrated from Germany and settled in Kentucky.[2]
Johannes "Reginald" Beam (1760–1834) was a farmer who began producing whiskey in the style that became known as bourbon. Jacob Beam sold his first barrels of corn whiskey around 1795. The whiskey was first called Old Jake Beam Sour Mash, and the distillery was known as Old Tub.[3]
David Beam (1802–1854) took on his father's responsibilities in 1820 at the age of 18, expanding distribution of the family's bourbon during a time of industrial revolution. David M. Beam (1833–1913) in 1854 moved the distillery to Nelson County to capitalize on the growing network of railroad lines connecting states. James Beauregard Beam (1864–1947) managed the family business before and after Prohibition, rebuilding the distillery in 1933 in Clermont, Kentucky, near his Bardstown home. James B. Beam Distilling Company was founded in 1935 by Harry L. Homel, Oliver Jacobson, H. Blum and Jeremiah Beam. From this point forward, the bourbon would be called "Jim Beam Bourbon" after James Beauregard Beam, and some of the bottle labels bear the statement, "None Genuine Without My Signature" with the signature James B. Beam.[citation needed] T. Jeremiah Beam (1899–1977) started working at the Clear Springs distillery in 1913, later becoming the master distiller and overseeing operations at the new Clermont facility. Jeremiah Beam eventually gained full ownership and opened a second distillery near Boston, Kentucky, in 1954. Jeremiah later teamed up with childhood friend Jimberlain Joseph Quinn, to expand the enterprise.
Booker Noe (1929–2004),[4] birth name Frederick Booker Noe II, grandson of Jim Beam, was the Master Distiller at the Jim Beam Distillery for more than 40 years, working closely with Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007). In 1987 Booker introduced his own namesake bourbon, Booker's, the company's first uncut, straight-from-the-barrel bourbon,[citation needed] and the first of the company's "Small Batch Bourbon Collection".
Fred Noe (1957–present), birth name Frederick Booker Noe III, became the seventh generation Beam family distiller in 2007 and regularly travels for promotional purposes.
The Beam family has also played a major role in the history of the Heaven Hill Distillery. All of the Master Distillers at Heaven Hill since its founding have been members of the Beam family. The original Master Distiller at Heaven Hill was Joseph L. Beam, Jim Beam's first cousin. He was followed by his son, Harry, who was followed by Earl Beam, the son of Jim Beam's brother, Park. Earl Beam was then succeeded by the current Heaven Hill Master Distillers, Parker Beam and his son, Craig Beam.
In 1987, Jim Beam purchased National Brands, acquiring brands including Old Crow,[5] Bourbon de Luxe, Old Taylor, Old Grand-Dad, and Sunny Brook.[6] Old Taylor was subsequently sold to the Sazerac Company.
On August 4, 2003, a fire destroyed a Jim Beam aging warehouse in Bardstown, Kentucky. It held about 19,000 barrels of bourbon. Flames rose more than 100 feet from the burning structure. Burning bourbon spilled from the warehouse and set a nearby creek on fire. An estimated 19,000 fish died of the bourbon in the creek and a river.[7]
For some period of time, Jim Beam was part of the holding company formerly known as Fortune Brands that was dismantled in 2011. Other parts of the remaining company were spun off as an IPO on the NYSE on the same day, as Fortune Brands Home & Security, and the liquor division of the holding company was renamed Beam, Inc. on October 4, 2011.
In January 2014, it was announced that Jim Beam would be purchased by Suntory Holdings Ltd., a Japanese group of brewers & distillers known for producing Japan's first whiskey. Suntory agreed to acquire Jim Beam, Maker's Mark, Teacher's Highland Cream and Laphroaig distillery Scotch whiskies for approximately $13.62 billion and also take on Beam's debt. This deal is the biggest Suntory has ever agreed to and will elevate them to the third largest maker of distilled drinks in the world.[8][9] The combined company is expected to have annual sales of spirits products of more than $4.3 billion. Suntory will pay $83.50 per share, a 25 percent premium to Beam's Friday closing price of $66.97. The companies put the deal's value at about $16 billion, including debt. According to press releases regarding the deal, the Illinois-based Jim Beam will continue to be managed by its current leadership. Beam and Suntory unanimously approved the transaction; however, the deal needs to be approved by Beam Inc. stockholders.[10] Pending approval by its shareholders, the deal was expected to close by June 30, 2014.[9] Jim Beam and Suntory have a previous partnership where they would freely distribute each other's brands in different markets.[8]
In October 2016 more than 200 workers went on strike at Jim Beam Distilleries in Clermont and Boston after voting to reject their latest contract offer.[11]
Distillers[edit]
In the history of the brand now known as Jim Beam, there have been seven generations of distillers from the Beam (and Noe) family. Retired Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007) was the first non-Beam to be Master Distiller at the company, and his successor was a member of the family.

Products[edit]




Jim Beam White Label, Beam's high-volume label.


Several varieties bearing the Jim Beam name are available.[12]

Straight Bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Original (white label) – aged 4 years in new charred oak barrels, 80 proof, the flagship whiskey
Jim Beam Choice (green label) – aged 5 years, 80 proof, charcoal filtered
Jim Beam Devil's Cut – aged 6 years,[13] uses extracted bourbon reclaimed from the walls of the cask after pouring, 90 proof
Jim Beam Seven Year (white label, red cap) – aged 7 years, 80 proof
Jim Beam Black (black label) – used to be aged 8 years (aged 6 years in export markets), but dropped the age statement at the beginning of 2015[14] - 86 proof
Jim Beam Bonded (metallic gold label) – aged 4 years, 100 proof, bottled in bond


Signature Craft whiskey


Jim Beam Harvest Collection (limited release) – six bourbons aged 11 years or more, each made with particular grains including triticale, high rye, six-row barley, soft red wheat, brown rice, and whole rolled oat
Jim Beam Signature Craft bourbon whiskey – aged 12 years, 86 proof[15]
Jim Beam Signature Craft whiskey finished with Rare Spanish Brandy – aged 12 years, with Spanish brandy blended into the bourbon - 86 proof
Jim Beam Signature Craft Quarter Cask Bourbon – bourbon aged at least 5 years and finished in a variety of quarter-size casks for at least an additional 4 years
Jim Beam Distiller's Masterpiece - finished in PX sherry casks - 100 proof


Straight rye whiskey


Jim Beam Rye (dark green label) – Rye whiskey, aged 4 years, 90 proof


"White whiskey"


Jacob's Ghost – 80 proof, aged one year in uncharred barrels and filtered


Single-barrel bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Single Barrel – no age statement (aged between 4 and 7 years), chill-filtered (giving it a lighter and clearer quality)[16] - 95 proof (released March 2014)[17]


Blended whiskey


Beam's Eight Star (gold label) – 80 proof, comprising 75% neutral spirits and 25% straight whiskey (on a proof gallon basis)





Red Stag black cherry bourbon liqueur.



Liqueurs


Jim Beam Apple – with apple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Honey – an infusion of "real honey" in the flagship white label bourbon[18] - 70 proof
Jim Beam Maple – with maple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Kentucky Fire – with cinnamon liqueur - 70 proof[19]
"Red Stag by Jim Beam" bourbon liqueurs:

Black Cherry (white label) – 80 proof
Hardcore Cider (green label) – 80 proof
Spiced with Cinnamon (red label) – 80 proof



Several of these offerings have performed quite well at international spirits ratings competitions. For example, Jim Beam's Black label was awarded a gold medal at the 2012 San Francisco World Spirits Competition.[20] Jim Beam Black also won a Gold Outstanding medal at the 2013 International Wine and Spirit Competition.[21]

The Beam "Small Batch Bourbon Collection" consists of several bourbons where the Beam name appears on the labels and marketing materials but is less prominent.

Booker's: aged 6+ years, 120–129.2 proof (60–64.60% ABV)
Baker's: aged 7 years, 107 proof (53.5% ABV)
Basil Hayden's: aged 6 and 8 years, 80 proof (40% ABV); uses the Old Grand-Dad "high-rye" mash bill.
Knob Creek: aged 9 years, 100 proof (50% ABV), with a 9-year, 120-proof (60% ABV) single-barrel expression, and a 100 proof (50% ABV) rye whiskey.



Process[edit]
Bourbon whiskey distillers must follow government standards for production. By law (27 C.F.R. 5), any "straight" bourbon must be: produced in the United States; made of a grain mix of at least 51% corn; distilled at no higher than 160 proof (80% ABV); free of any additives (except water to reduce proof for aging and bottling); aged in new, charred white oak barrels; entered into the aging barrels at no higher than 125 proof (62.5% ABV), aged for a minimum of 2 years, and bottled at no less than 80 proof (40% ABV).
Jim Beam starts with water filtered naturally by the limestone shelf found in Central Kentucky. A strain of yeast used since the end of Prohibition is added to a tank with the grains to create what is known as "dona yeast", used later in the fermentation process. Hammer mills grind the mix of corn, rye and barley malt to break it down for easier cooking. The mix is then moved into a large mash cooker where water and set back are added. The "set back" is a portion of the old mash from the previous distillation—the key step of the sour mash process, ensuring consistency from batch to batch.
From the cooker, the mash heads to the fermenter where it is cooled to 60–70 °F and yeast is added again. The yeast is fed by the sugars in the mash, producing heat, carbon dioxide and alcohol. Called "distiller's beer" or "wash", the resulting liquid (after filtering to remove solids) looks, smells and tastes like (and essentially is) a form of beer. The wash is pumped into a column still where it is heated to over 200 °F, causing the alcohol to turn to a vapor. As the vapor cools and falls it turns to a liquid called "low wine", which measures 125 proof or 62.5% alcohol.[citation needed] A second distillation in a pot still heats and condenses the liquid into "high wine", which reaches 135 proof (67.5% alcohol).[citation needed]
The high wine is moved to new, charred American oak barrels, each of which hold about 53 gallons of liquid. A "bung" is used to seal the barrels before moving them to nearby hilltop rackhouses where they will age up to nine years. As the seasons change, natural weather variations expand and contract the barrel wood, allowing bourbon to seep into the barrel, and the caramelized sugars from the charred oak flavor and color the bourbon. A significant portion (known as the "angel's share") of the 53 gallons of bourbon escapes the barrel through evaporation, or stays trapped in the wood of the barrel.[22] Jim Beam ages for at least four years, or twice as long as the government requires for a "straight" bourbon. At the end of the aging period the amber liquid is filtered, bottled, packaged and sent to one of many distributors around the world using the three-tier distribution system.[citation needed]
Food and merchandise[edit]
On July 26, 2004, THANASI Foods announced the release of Jim Beam Soaked Sunflower Seeds, a snack product soaked in Jim Beam and available in 3 flavors; Original, Barbeque, and Jalapeño. On October 18, 2004, the company announced the addition of Jim Beam Soaked Beef Jerky to the range. Jim Beam has a licensing agreement with Vita Food Products to manufacture and sell Jim Beam BBQ Sauces, Marinades, Mustards, Steak Sauces, Hot Sauce, Wing Sauce, Pancake Syrup and Glazes. Vita Specialty Foods also produces a range of Jim Beam hot smoked and fresh, marinated salmon. Top Shelf Gourmet specializes in Jim Beam bourbon-infused fresh pork and poultry products, including Jim Beam Bourbon Barrel Ham, Pulled Pork, and Pulled Chicken.
Brandmark Products produces a full range of Jim Beam branded billiard and home recreation products. Zippo produces a range of Jim Beam branded pocket and multi-purpose lighters. Bradley Smoker produces a line of Jim Beam branded smokers and smoking briquettes made from Jim Beam Barrels. Silver Buffalo designs Jim Beam wall art, dartboards and accessories for home recreational use. Concept One develops Jim Beam headwear. Headline Entertainment develops Jim Beam T-shirts and outerwear. Sherwood Brands produces a full line of Jim Beam gift sets.[23]
Global markets[edit]
Outside the United States, Beam Global Spirits & Wine has had a sales and distribution alliance with The Edrington Group since 2009. [24]
See also[edit]


Liquor portal
Drink portal



Jack Daniel's, the top-selling American whiskey in the world (a Brown-Forman Tennessee whiskey)
Maker's Mark, a premium sister brand of bourbon produced by Beam Suntory
Robby Gordon Motorsports, racing team sponsored by Jim Beam from 2005 to 2009.

References[edit]


^ Beveragenet Reference URL last accessed April 11, 2008. Archived May 1, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ The History of the Böhm/Beam family (in German)
^ "Beam's History". Beam Suntory. Retrieved September 16, 2016. 
^ Prial, Frank J. (February 27, 2004). "F. Booker Noe II, 74, Master Bourbon Distiller". The New York Times. 
^ "Old Crow Whiskey, a fine Bourbon". whiskeywise.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "National Distillers Products". bottlebooks.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 10 September 2003. 
^ a b "Japan's Suntory buys Jim Beam drinks group in $16bn deal". BBC News Business. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ a b Cane, Jeffery (13 January 2014). "Suntory of Japan to Buy Maker of Jim Beam for $13.6 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Suntory Buying Spirits Maker Beam for $13.62B". The Associated Press. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 15 October 2016. 
^ "Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey Liquor Drinks| Jim Beam Bourbon Whiskey". Jimbeam.com. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Devil's Cut 90 Proof Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Black Extra Aged Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Signature Craft". Retrieved March 19, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Single Barrel Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 23, 2014). "Jim Beam's New Single-Barrel Bourbon Is 95 Proof, and Kid Rock Likes It". BusinessWeek.com. BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 20, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Honey Spirit Drink". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Kentucky Fire". Jim Beam. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Proof66.com Ratings and Review Summary Page for Jim Beam Black". Proof66.com. Retrieved 2012-10-21. 
^ Spirit Details: Jim Beam Black Bourbon Whiskey 8YO
^ Jim Beam Bourbon-Making Process, documented by Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ Active Licensing and Partnership Agreements, Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ "Beam Global Spirits & Wine and The Edrington Group Launch International Sales and Distribution Alliance (press release)". Business Wire. April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 12, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Jim Beam.



Jim Beam official website







v
t
e


Kentucky Bourbon Trail



Primary Trail



Evan Williams Bourbon Experience
Four Roses Distillery
Heaven Hill's Bourbon Heritage Center
Jim Beam Distillery
Maker's Mark Distillery
Stitzel-Weller Distillery
Town Branch Distillery
Wild Turkey Distillery
Woodford Reserve Distillery










Craft Tour



Barrel House Distillery
Corsair Artisan Distillery
Limestone Branch Distillery
MB Roland Distillery
Old Pogue Distillery
Silver Trail Distillery
Wilderness Trail Distillery
Willett Distillery






  Liquor portal








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Jim_Beam&oldid=790203511"					
Categories: Bourbon whiskeyAlcoholic drink brandsDistilleries in KentuckyBeam Suntory1795 introductionsBullitt County, KentuckyKentucky cuisineAmerican brandsHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll Wikipedia articles needing clarificationWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2011Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles with hRecipesArticles with hProductsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2012Articles with unsourced statements from February 2011Articles with unsourced statements from January 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyar日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 12 July 2017, at 07:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Jim Beam - Wikipedia






















 






Jim Beam

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Jim Beam




Type
Bourbon whiskey


Manufacturer
Beam Suntory


Country of origin
United States


Introduced
1795


Proof (US)
80 and 86


Variants
White label, Green label, Black label; (see below for complete list)


Related products
(see below for list)


Jim Beam is a brand of bourbon whiskey produced in Clermont, Kentucky, by Beam Suntory, a subsidiary of Suntory Holdings of Osaka, Japan. It is one of the best selling brands of bourbon in the world.[1] Since 1795 (interrupted by Prohibition), seven generations of the Beam family have been involved in whiskey production for the company that produces the brand, which was given the name "Jim Beam" in 1933 in honor of James B. Beam, who rebuilt the business after Prohibition ended. Previously produced by the Beam family and later owned by the Fortune Brands holding company, the brand was purchased by Suntory Holdings in 2014.



Contents


1 History
2 Distillers
3 Products
4 Process
5 Food and merchandise
6 Global markets
7 See also
8 References
9 External links



History[edit]
During the late 18th century, members of the Böhm family, who eventually changed the spelling of their surname to "Beam", emigrated from Germany and settled in Kentucky.[2]
Johannes "Reginald" Beam (1760–1834) was a farmer who began producing whiskey in the style that became known as bourbon. Jacob Beam sold his first barrels of corn whiskey around 1795. The whiskey was first called Old Jake Beam Sour Mash, and the distillery was known as Old Tub.[3]
David Beam (1802–1854) took on his father's responsibilities in 1820 at the age of 18, expanding distribution of the family's bourbon during a time of industrial revolution. David M. Beam (1833–1913) in 1854 moved the distillery to Nelson County to capitalize on the growing network of railroad lines connecting states. James Beauregard Beam (1864–1947) managed the family business before and after Prohibition, rebuilding the distillery in 1933 in Clermont, Kentucky, near his Bardstown home. James B. Beam Distilling Company was founded in 1935 by Harry L. Homel, Oliver Jacobson, H. Blum and Jeremiah Beam. From this point forward, the bourbon would be called "Jim Beam Bourbon" after James Beauregard Beam, and some of the bottle labels bear the statement, "None Genuine Without My Signature" with the signature James B. Beam.[citation needed] T. Jeremiah Beam (1899–1977) started working at the Clear Springs distillery in 1913, later becoming the master distiller and overseeing operations at the new Clermont facility. Jeremiah Beam eventually gained full ownership and opened a second distillery near Boston, Kentucky, in 1954. Jeremiah later teamed up with childhood friend Jimberlain Joseph Quinn, to expand the enterprise.
Booker Noe (1929–2004),[4] birth name Frederick Booker Noe II, grandson of Jim Beam, was the Master Distiller at the Jim Beam Distillery for more than 40 years, working closely with Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007). In 1987 Booker introduced his own namesake bourbon, Booker's, the company's first uncut, straight-from-the-barrel bourbon,[citation needed] and the first of the company's "Small Batch Bourbon Collection".
Fred Noe (1957–present), birth name Frederick Booker Noe III, became the seventh generation Beam family distiller in 2007 and regularly travels for promotional purposes.
The Beam family has also played a major role in the history of the Heaven Hill Distillery. All of the Master Distillers at Heaven Hill since its founding have been members of the Beam family. The original Master Distiller at Heaven Hill was Joseph L. Beam, Jim Beam's first cousin. He was followed by his son, Harry, who was followed by Earl Beam, the son of Jim Beam's brother, Park. Earl Beam was then succeeded by the current Heaven Hill Master Distillers, Parker Beam and his son, Craig Beam.
In 1987, Jim Beam purchased National Brands, acquiring brands including Old Crow,[5] Bourbon de Luxe, Old Taylor, Old Grand-Dad, and Sunny Brook.[6] Old Taylor was subsequently sold to the Sazerac Company.
On August 4, 2003, a fire destroyed a Jim Beam aging warehouse in Bardstown, Kentucky. It held about 19,000 barrels of bourbon. Flames rose more than 100 feet from the burning structure. Burning bourbon spilled from the warehouse and set a nearby creek on fire. An estimated 19,000 fish died of the bourbon in the creek and a river.[7]
For some period of time, Jim Beam was part of the holding company formerly known as Fortune Brands that was dismantled in 2011. Other parts of the remaining company were spun off as an IPO on the NYSE on the same day, as Fortune Brands Home & Security, and the liquor division of the holding company was renamed Beam, Inc. on October 4, 2011.
In January 2014, it was announced that Jim Beam would be purchased by Suntory Holdings Ltd., a Japanese group of brewers & distillers known for producing Japan's first whiskey. Suntory agreed to acquire Jim Beam, Maker's Mark, Teacher's Highland Cream and Laphroaig distillery Scotch whiskies for approximately $13.62 billion and also take on Beam's debt. This deal is the biggest Suntory has ever agreed to and will elevate them to the third largest maker of distilled drinks in the world.[8][9] The combined company is expected to have annual sales of spirits products of more than $4.3 billion. Suntory will pay $83.50 per share, a 25 percent premium to Beam's Friday closing price of $66.97. The companies put the deal's value at about $16 billion, including debt. According to press releases regarding the deal, the Illinois-based Jim Beam will continue to be managed by its current leadership. Beam and Suntory unanimously approved the transaction; however, the deal needs to be approved by Beam Inc. stockholders.[10] Pending approval by its shareholders, the deal was expected to close by June 30, 2014.[9] Jim Beam and Suntory have a previous partnership where they would freely distribute each other's brands in different markets.[8]
In October 2016 more than 200 workers went on strike at Jim Beam Distilleries in Clermont and Boston after voting to reject their latest contract offer.[11]
Distillers[edit]
In the history of the brand now known as Jim Beam, there have been seven generations of distillers from the Beam (and Noe) family. Retired Master Distiller Jerry Dalton (1998–2007) was the first non-Beam to be Master Distiller at the company, and his successor was a member of the family.

Products[edit]




Jim Beam White Label, Beam's high-volume label.


Several varieties bearing the Jim Beam name are available.[12]

Straight Bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Original (white label) – aged 4 years in new charred oak barrels, 80 proof, the flagship whiskey
Jim Beam Choice (green label) – aged 5 years, 80 proof, charcoal filtered
Jim Beam Devil's Cut – aged 6 years,[13] uses extracted bourbon reclaimed from the walls of the cask after pouring, 90 proof
Jim Beam Seven Year (white label, red cap) – aged 7 years, 80 proof
Jim Beam Black (black label) – used to be aged 8 years (aged 6 years in export markets), but dropped the age statement at the beginning of 2015[14] - 86 proof
Jim Beam Bonded (metallic gold label) – aged 4 years, 100 proof, bottled in bond


Signature Craft whiskey


Jim Beam Harvest Collection (limited release) – six bourbons aged 11 years or more, each made with particular grains including triticale, high rye, six-row barley, soft red wheat, brown rice, and whole rolled oat
Jim Beam Signature Craft bourbon whiskey – aged 12 years, 86 proof[15]
Jim Beam Signature Craft whiskey finished with Rare Spanish Brandy – aged 12 years, with Spanish brandy blended into the bourbon - 86 proof
Jim Beam Signature Craft Quarter Cask Bourbon – bourbon aged at least 5 years and finished in a variety of quarter-size casks for at least an additional 4 years
Jim Beam Distiller's Masterpiece - finished in PX sherry casks - 100 proof


Straight rye whiskey


Jim Beam Rye (dark green label) – Rye whiskey, aged 4 years, 90 proof


"White whiskey"


Jacob's Ghost – 80 proof, aged one year in uncharred barrels and filtered


Single-barrel bourbon whiskey


Jim Beam Single Barrel – no age statement (aged between 4 and 7 years), chill-filtered (giving it a lighter and clearer quality)[16] - 95 proof (released March 2014)[17]


Blended whiskey


Beam's Eight Star (gold label) – 80 proof, comprising 75% neutral spirits and 25% straight whiskey (on a proof gallon basis)





Red Stag black cherry bourbon liqueur.



Liqueurs


Jim Beam Apple – with apple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Honey – an infusion of "real honey" in the flagship white label bourbon[18] - 70 proof
Jim Beam Maple – with maple liqueur - 70 proof
Jim Beam Kentucky Fire – with cinnamon liqueur - 70 proof[19]
"Red Stag by Jim Beam" bourbon liqueurs:

Black Cherry (white label) – 80 proof
Hardcore Cider (green label) – 80 proof
Spiced with Cinnamon (red label) – 80 proof



Several of these offerings have performed quite well at international spirits ratings competitions. For example, Jim Beam's Black label was awarded a gold medal at the 2012 San Francisco World Spirits Competition.[20] Jim Beam Black also won a Gold Outstanding medal at the 2013 International Wine and Spirit Competition.[21]

The Beam "Small Batch Bourbon Collection" consists of several bourbons where the Beam name appears on the labels and marketing materials but is less prominent.

Booker's: aged 6+ years, 120–129.2 proof (60–64.60% ABV)
Baker's: aged 7 years, 107 proof (53.5% ABV)
Basil Hayden's: aged 6 and 8 years, 80 proof (40% ABV); uses the Old Grand-Dad "high-rye" mash bill.
Knob Creek: aged 9 years, 100 proof (50% ABV), with a 9-year, 120-proof (60% ABV) single-barrel expression, and a 100 proof (50% ABV) rye whiskey.



Process[edit]
Bourbon whiskey distillers must follow government standards for production. By law (27 C.F.R. 5), any "straight" bourbon must be: produced in the United States; made of a grain mix of at least 51% corn; distilled at no higher than 160 proof (80% ABV); free of any additives (except water to reduce proof for aging and bottling); aged in new, charred white oak barrels; entered into the aging barrels at no higher than 125 proof (62.5% ABV), aged for a minimum of 2 years, and bottled at no less than 80 proof (40% ABV).
Jim Beam starts with water filtered naturally by the limestone shelf found in Central Kentucky. A strain of yeast used since the end of Prohibition is added to a tank with the grains to create what is known as "dona yeast", used later in the fermentation process. Hammer mills grind the mix of corn, rye and barley malt to break it down for easier cooking. The mix is then moved into a large mash cooker where water and set back are added. The "set back" is a portion of the old mash from the previous distillation—the key step of the sour mash process, ensuring consistency from batch to batch.
From the cooker, the mash heads to the fermenter where it is cooled to 60–70 °F and yeast is added again. The yeast is fed by the sugars in the mash, producing heat, carbon dioxide and alcohol. Called "distiller's beer" or "wash", the resulting liquid (after filtering to remove solids) looks, smells and tastes like (and essentially is) a form of beer. The wash is pumped into a column still where it is heated to over 200 °F, causing the alcohol to turn to a vapor. As the vapor cools and falls it turns to a liquid called "low wine", which measures 125 proof or 62.5% alcohol.[citation needed] A second distillation in a pot still heats and condenses the liquid into "high wine", which reaches 135 proof (67.5% alcohol).[citation needed]
The high wine is moved to new, charred American oak barrels, each of which hold about 53 gallons of liquid. A "bung" is used to seal the barrels before moving them to nearby hilltop rackhouses where they will age up to nine years. As the seasons change, natural weather variations expand and contract the barrel wood, allowing bourbon to seep into the barrel, and the caramelized sugars from the charred oak flavor and color the bourbon. A significant portion (known as the "angel's share") of the 53 gallons of bourbon escapes the barrel through evaporation, or stays trapped in the wood of the barrel.[22] Jim Beam ages for at least four years, or twice as long as the government requires for a "straight" bourbon. At the end of the aging period the amber liquid is filtered, bottled, packaged and sent to one of many distributors around the world using the three-tier distribution system.[citation needed]
Food and merchandise[edit]
On July 26, 2004, THANASI Foods announced the release of Jim Beam Soaked Sunflower Seeds, a snack product soaked in Jim Beam and available in 3 flavors; Original, Barbeque, and Jalapeño. On October 18, 2004, the company announced the addition of Jim Beam Soaked Beef Jerky to the range. Jim Beam has a licensing agreement with Vita Food Products to manufacture and sell Jim Beam BBQ Sauces, Marinades, Mustards, Steak Sauces, Hot Sauce, Wing Sauce, Pancake Syrup and Glazes. Vita Specialty Foods also produces a range of Jim Beam hot smoked and fresh, marinated salmon. Top Shelf Gourmet specializes in Jim Beam bourbon-infused fresh pork and poultry products, including Jim Beam Bourbon Barrel Ham, Pulled Pork, and Pulled Chicken.
Brandmark Products produces a full range of Jim Beam branded billiard and home recreation products. Zippo produces a range of Jim Beam branded pocket and multi-purpose lighters. Bradley Smoker produces a line of Jim Beam branded smokers and smoking briquettes made from Jim Beam Barrels. Silver Buffalo designs Jim Beam wall art, dartboards and accessories for home recreational use. Concept One develops Jim Beam headwear. Headline Entertainment develops Jim Beam T-shirts and outerwear. Sherwood Brands produces a full line of Jim Beam gift sets.[23]
Global markets[edit]
Outside the United States, Beam Global Spirits & Wine has had a sales and distribution alliance with The Edrington Group since 2009. [24]
See also[edit]


Liquor portal
Drink portal



Jack Daniel's, the top-selling American whiskey in the world (a Brown-Forman Tennessee whiskey)
Maker's Mark, a premium sister brand of bourbon produced by Beam Suntory
Robby Gordon Motorsports, racing team sponsored by Jim Beam from 2005 to 2009.

References[edit]


^ Beveragenet Reference URL last accessed April 11, 2008. Archived May 1, 2006, at the Wayback Machine.
^ The History of the Böhm/Beam family (in German)
^ "Beam's History". Beam Suntory. Retrieved September 16, 2016. 
^ Prial, Frank J. (February 27, 2004). "F. Booker Noe II, 74, Master Bourbon Distiller". The New York Times. 
^ "Old Crow Whiskey, a fine Bourbon". whiskeywise.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "National Distillers Products". bottlebooks.com. Retrieved March 26, 2011. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 10 September 2003. 
^ a b "Japan's Suntory buys Jim Beam drinks group in $16bn deal". BBC News Business. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ a b Cane, Jeffery (13 January 2014). "Suntory of Japan to Buy Maker of Jim Beam for $13.6 Billion". New York Times. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Suntory Buying Spirits Maker Beam for $13.62B". The Associated Press. 13 January 2014. Retrieved 13 January 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam will pay state for fish killed after fire". The Associated Press. 15 October 2016. 
^ "Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey Liquor Drinks| Jim Beam Bourbon Whiskey". Jimbeam.com. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Devil's Cut 90 Proof Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Black Extra Aged Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Jim Beam Signature Craft". Retrieved March 19, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Single Barrel Kentucky Straight Bourbon Whiskey". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ Leonard, Devin (December 23, 2014). "Jim Beam's New Single-Barrel Bourbon Is 95 Proof, and Kid Rock Likes It". BusinessWeek.com. BusinessWeek. Retrieved March 20, 2014. 
^ "Jim Beam Honey Spirit Drink". Proof66 LLC. 2015. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Kentucky Fire". Jim Beam. Retrieved 2015-12-18. 
^ "Proof66.com Ratings and Review Summary Page for Jim Beam Black". Proof66.com. Retrieved 2012-10-21. 
^ Spirit Details: Jim Beam Black Bourbon Whiskey 8YO
^ Jim Beam Bourbon-Making Process, documented by Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ Active Licensing and Partnership Agreements, Beam Global Spirits & Wine, September 2008[vague]
^ "Beam Global Spirits & Wine and The Edrington Group Launch International Sales and Distribution Alliance (press release)". Business Wire. April 1, 2009. Retrieved April 12, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Jim Beam.



Jim Beam official website







v
t
e


Kentucky Bourbon Trail



Primary Trail



Evan Williams Bourbon Experience
Four Roses Distillery
Heaven Hill's Bourbon Heritage Center
Jim Beam Distillery
Maker's Mark Distillery
Stitzel-Weller Distillery
Town Branch Distillery
Wild Turkey Distillery
Woodford Reserve Distillery










Craft Tour



Barrel House Distillery
Corsair Artisan Distillery
Limestone Branch Distillery
MB Roland Distillery
Old Pogue Distillery
Silver Trail Distillery
Wilderness Trail Distillery
Willett Distillery






  Liquor portal








 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Jim_Beam&oldid=790203511"					
Categories: Bourbon whiskeyAlcoholic drink brandsDistilleries in KentuckyBeam Suntory1795 introductionsBullitt County, KentuckyKentucky cuisineAmerican brandsHidden categories: Webarchive template wayback linksAll Wikipedia articles needing clarificationWikipedia articles needing clarification from February 2011Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles with hRecipesArticles with hProductsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from November 2012Articles with unsourced statements from February 2011Articles with unsourced statements from January 2014 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


БългарскиЧӑвашлаČeštinaDanskDeutschEspañolFrançais한국어ItalianoMagyar日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiРусскийSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 12 July 2017, at 07:33.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 






 


James Black | Professional Profile
 


























 









LinkedIn



















































Main content starts below.




James BlackLocationAtlantic Highlands, New JerseyIndustryTelecommunicationsCurrentMaendeleo VenturesPreviousSprint-Nextel, SprintEducationTarkio CollegeRecommendations6 people have recommended James84 connectionsView James’ full profile. It's free!Your colleagues, classmates, and 500 million other professionals are on LinkedIn.View James’ Full ProfileSummaryI am a telecommunications expert who helps the senior management of international corporations make smart technology decisions.I have over 15 years experience, mostly with Sprint, intitating and managing 40+ projects up to $25M, and have managed teams of 8 engineers.  I am a trained TQM team leader, have worked in China, Japan, Taiwan, England and Italy and am fluent in French.OTHER RELEVANT EXPERIENCEDesigned the architectural growth of the Sprint fiber optic networkConducted Research on SONET and ULH-DWDM equipment for future deploymentSprint expert on Network SynchronizationPATENTSSeven Patents issued by he US Patent Office and five patent applications pendingINVITED AS A PANELIST OR PRESENTED PAPERS• Consumer Electronics Show - Mobile Entertainment  2010• Consumer Electronics Show - Digital Hollywood 2009 • Building Blocks & Digital Hollywood 2008• WebbyConnect 2008• IBC Conference in Amsterdam 2006• IEEE International Symposium on Broadband Multimedia 2006• European Conference on Optical Communication 2002 • NFOEC and OFC  Multiple papers 1998-2005Specialties: Fiber Optics, Network Design, Metro Ethernet, Network Sychronization, Digital Content, Mobile Video and Social MediaExperienceITC ConsultantMaendeleo VenturesMay 2009  –  Present (8 years 3 months)• Reviewer for the Broadband Technology Opportunities Program grant applications for the National Telecommunications and Information Administration  • ITC consultant with Maendeleo Ventures focusing on United States Trade Development Agency telecommunication infrastructure projects in Western Africa• Consulted with a major US manufacturer of intelligent optical and packet-optimized multiservice switches to predict the future direction and evolution of networks, products and services for the major US telecommunication providersResearch Scientist IIISprint-NextelJune 2006  –  March 2009 (2 years 10 months)Lead researcher in the Digital Media Innovation Group:• Saved $200,000 by recommending that our VC Unit stop an investment with a start-up company after finding problems with their product (Excellence Award)• Spearheaded joint research projects with leading companies such as Intel and Sun to determine the potential of new technologies for Sprint services• Created a Social Networking site for chronic-care patients for Corporate Sales and demonstrated it to a regional health center resulting in a $100K sale and potential large scale partnershipPrincipal Member of the Technical StaffSprintJune 2004  –  May 2006 (2 years)• Conducted research on the transport of HD video over IP networks which resulted in retaining a $2M/year client (multiple patents filed)• Quantified the effects of wireless network impairments on mobile video to identify a method to indirectly detect degradation of video quality (patent filed) • Created a testing suite that determined real-time testing tools can reliably measure video quality, thereby reducing network trouble-shooting time by 20%Senior Applied R&D EngineerSprintApril 1998  –  May 2004 (6 years 2 months)• Improved bandwidth efficiency by 25% to 65% by proving that Packet-over SONET technology can optimize SONET Networks capacity usage (Excellence Award)• Wrote the Technical portions of RFPs, scored the responses and evaluated the new equipment assuring the most advanced and reliable technologies for the network  • Proved that Circuit Emulation technology can reliably deliver TDM services over Ethernet networks, reducing the cost per bit, versus TDM networks, by ~70%Senior Network Design EngineerSprintFebruary 1996  –  March 1998 (2 years 2 months)International Planning:• Planned and negotiated a mutual emergency restoration agreement with Teleglobe that reduced the costs for the PTAT Submarine Cable System by $2M per year for a total of $16M over 8 years (ROI Award)• Obtained the first non-Bell submarine fiber optic consortium cable system landing station in the US by planning, project managing, creating the business case, obtaining funding approval and writing the winning proposal.• Increased income by $860,000 by facilitating an agreement among France Telecom, Mitsubishi and Pirelli. (ROI Award)PublicationsHigh Definition Video Broadcast over Core IP NetworksOptical Fiber Communication Conference and Exposition and The National Fiber Optic Engineers Conference 2006March 2006Authors: James Black, Claudio Lima, Jay Cee Straley, Ray Huang, James Pan, Linda Chau, JJ YeaLanguagesFrenchSkillsTelecommunicationsWirelessNetwork DesignEthernetStart-upsSDH3GFiber OpticsProject ManagementProject PlanningBroadbandWireless NetworkingNetworkingMobile DevicesIPSee 8+LTEDWDMVoIPTCP/IPProduct ManagementSwitchesTroubleshooting4GSee lessHow's this translation?Great•Has errorsThanks for your help!PatentsSystem and Method for Transmitting Video InformationUnited States 7,852,853Issued December 2010Inventors: James BlackSystem of Making Customer TransfersUnited States 7,764,600Issued July 2010Inventors: James BlackFault Recovery for Communication NetworksUnited States 7,453,795Issued November 2008Inventors: James BlackSystem and Method for Characterizing Error Correction Performance for Digital Data Transport over an IP NetworkUnited States 7788568Issued August 2010Inventors: James BlackPrediction-based adaptive content broadcasting over a networkUnited States 8001217Issued July 2011Inventors: James BlackIdentifying InfluencersAmong a Group of Wireless-Subscription SubscribersUnited States 8,214,253 B1Issued July 2012A system for identifying subscribers who exert influence on a group of wireless users for the purpose of giving them incentives to wield that influence to attract and/or retain members of their circle.Inventors: James BlackIdentifying Influencers Among a Group of Wireless-subscription SubcribersUnited States 8645187Issued February 2014identifies the most influential member of frequent calling groups and targets them to encourage retention and growth of the group membersInventors: James BlackManagement of requested or pushed content in communications client devicesUSPTO Issued August 2014A system, a method and computer-readable media for managing content received over a network by a client device. A network transmission communicating an item of content is detected by a client device, and a determination is made whether the client device is in a mode of operation that allows the storing of uninvited media content. For example, the client device may be a mobile communication device monitoring the media being transmitted over a broadcast channel. When an item of content is observed traversing the broadcast channel, a set of user-defined preferences is accessed to determine whether to permit receiving the item. If permitted, the item of content is stored in a data store on the client device for subsequent presentation to the user.Inventors: James BlackEducationTarkio CollegeBSBSUS Army Signal Corps SchoolASASRecommendationsA preview of what LinkedIn members have to say about James:WOW! An impressive resume. 

Beats mine.

ChuckSee moreSee lessI have worked with Jim over a number of years and have found him to be extremely responsive to internal and external customer requests providing expert, insightful and concise technology assessments, demonstrations and prototypes which are always in tune to the target audience. Has a wide base of experience and state of the art technology knowledge that is hard to find in the industry today along with a keen focus on solving business problems. His professionalism is second to none.See moreSee lessSign up to see who recommended JamesView James’ full profile to...See who you know in commonGet introducedContact James directlyView James’ Full ProfileNot the James you’re looking for? View moreView this profile in another languageEnglishGermanPeople Also ViewedMike VollSector Leader, Power - OntarioWing LeeCEO at YTL Communications Sdn BhdDavid SmithM&A, Private Equity, VC, Corp Dev, FDI, InternationalizationTim CondonLen BarlikExecutive Vice President & Chief Operations OfficerLars BodenheimerClient Development | Business & Technology Strategy | Management ConsultingTom Crookbryce a. jonesTim KelleyEdward KressBusiness Development | Analytics | Alliances Management | Stategic Partnerships | GlobalPublic profile badgeInclude this LinkedIn profile on other websitesView profile badgesFind a different James BlackFirst NameLast NameExample:  James BlackJames BlackUnited StatesJames BlackRecruiting NinjaUnited StatesJames BlackSales at BMCUnited StatesJames BlackPresident of Chimney Pro LLCUnited StatesJames BlackIndependent Marketing Strategy & Insights ConsultantUnited StatesMore professionals named James BlackLinkedIn member directory:abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzmoreBrowse members by country

























Jim Beam® Brands | Bourbons


































 
















Menu
Close

















Our most popular searches:


All recipes


Book A Tour


Make History Today


All Bourbons


Bourbon vs. Whiskey























                    Meet the family
                













Jim Beam® Original









Jim Beam Black®









Jim Beam® Apple









Jim Beam® Vanilla









Jim Beam® Double Oak









Jim Beam® Devil’s Cut®









Jim Beam® Rye









Jim Beam® Bonded









Jim Beam® Honey









Red Stag by Jim Beam® Black Cherry









Jim Beam® Single Barrel









Jim Beam® Signature Craft Bourbons









Jim Beam® Distiller’s Masterpiece









Jim Beam® Kentucky Fire™









Jim Beam® Maple









Jim Beam® Signature Craft Harvest Bourbon Collection™









Jim Beam Jacob’s Ghost®











































    The world’s number 1 bourbon.


                    Jim Beam was founded in 1795 and has been operated by one family for seven generations. We’ve always created our bourbon our way, aging it twice as long as the law requires. That’s how we continue to Make History® every day.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    WORLD’S HIGHEST RATED BOURBON.


                    Elegant. Smooth. Refined. That’s what extra aging will do to bourbon. And now Jim Beam Black® is officially the #1 rated bourbon in the world after winning the Bourbon Trophy, the highest awarded accolade in the bourbon category at the 2016 International Wine and Spirit Competition (IWSC).
                


                        Explore
                    






























    Crisp to the core.


                    Premium bourbon meets the juicy refreshing of apple in Jim Beam® Apple. Enjoy our newest family member straight, on the rocks or as Jim Beam® Apple Splash.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    Two charred barrels, one rich bourbon. 


                    Like all of our bourbons, the new Jim Beam® Double Oak is crafted in charred oak. Its rich flavor comes from being aged a second time in another separate barrel. 
                


                        Discover more
                    






























    The Bold Reinvention of Bourbon.


                    Unleash bold Jim Beam® Devil’s Cut®. A premium bourbon of depth and complexity extracted from inside the barrel wood.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    The Return of a Legend.


                    Pre-prohibition style rye whiskey. Bartenders have been dying to get their hands on it for years. Now it’s back and bolder than ever. Founded in 1795, our rye whiskey is made from one of the Beam family’s oldest recipes and is distilled with the same exacting standards that have governed Jim Beam® for more than 200 years.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    100 proof and nothing to prove.


                    Our bonded bourbon is created from the highest quality ingredients and adheres to the Bottled in Bond Act of 1897. Enjoy a taste of history, today.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    Honey has a new hive.


                    Jim Beam® Honey opens a smooth chapter in the Jim Beam legend with complex notes of caramel, oak, vanilla and a finish of sweet honey.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    A Different Breed of Bourbon™.


                    Sometimes the uncharted path delivers the greatest rewards. Discover the distinctive taste of Red Stag by Jim Beam® complemented with a hint of black cherry.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    One single barrel. One incredible bourbon.


                    Our master distiller carefully selects each barrel by hand – less than one percent are chosen for Jim Beam® Single Barrel – ensuring the highest quality. No two barrels are the same, and each is individually bottled, labeled and hand-numbered.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    We built a new top shelf.


                    Our 7th Generation Master Distiller Fred Noe is pushing the boundaries by inventing the Jim Beam® Signature Craft Series bourbons by experimenting with rare mashbills and finishes. These bourbons should be savored neat or on the rocks.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    A True Art Form.


                    La crème de la crème. The best of the best. This is the rarest and highest quality bourbon created by 7th generation Master Distiller, Fred Noe, inspired by his dad’s original “masterpiece”.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    Relight your fire.


                    Fire up your next drink with a touch of cinnamon spice. Served straight, as a shot or as a mixer, Jim Beam® Kentucky Fire™ is always guaranteed to heat things up.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    Tap That Maple.


                    What happens when you infuse the world’s finest bourbon with the rich taste of maple? Our expert distillers found the answer with Jim Beam® Maple: a perfect balance of warm aromas, a hint of charred oak, complete with a subtle and smooth caramel finish.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    Jim Beam® Signature Craft Harvest Bourbon Collection.


                    Jim Beam® Harvest Bourbon Collection  best exemplifies the merger of tradition with unique experimentation and exploratory craftsmanship. It’s an ultimate experience for the truest of whiskey adventurers, with a product that wasn’t only 11 years, but seven generations, in the making.
                


                        Explore
                    






























    A white whiskey. 200 years in process.


                    In the early 18th century, Jacob Beam, founder and first distiller, started producing whiskey – white whiskey. Now, more than 200 years later, we dusted off his recipe and perfected the product that he first created.
                


                        Explore
                    

















    Become one of the family.


                            To visit the world’s #1 bourbon you must be of legal drinking age. Please drink responsibly.
                        




                                    Month:
                                






                                    Day:
                                






                                    Year:
                                





Enter
By entering you agree to our Terms and Conditions and our updated Privacy Policy.



                                Remember me, please.
                            


                                Oooops, something went wrong. Please try again later.
                            


You’re from


{{ country.name }}



Please select your country.














 





